added!
TIFU potato
Yay! Enjoy! I would love to do orange theory but we don't have it where I live =( I'm currently trying to get back into spinning-but at present am on my couch? 
Oh I see. Thanks for the clarification.  *The easiest way to get the correct answer on reddit is to first post a wrong answer*
&lt;He was yelling at me that it wasn't right to ask for a reference from him and then to quit as soon as he gave it &gt;  He's a damn idiot for not knowing that the primary reason employees ask for a reference is because they're looking for a different job.  What a dope. 
Shucks, I could've actually used this too. Oh well, too late :(
it wouldn't stay upright with just the one kickstand, this wasn't the first time it had fallen over just leaning on the stand. The front wheel would always twist and make the bike fall over.
I'm considering finding another job since my plant manager is giving me the run around on all the shit he promised me.
You say true and I say thankya.
And the same city in which he might live in once he's done with his playing career?
I think they were applauding because once he was done playing, he had fully conveyed the point he was trying to make. But maybe you're right. 
I haven't either. I'm sure it'll come out sooner or later 
You're going to have a hard enough enough finding someone who *has* an 6 for sale. That said, everybody will price drop them when the 7 comes out. FWIW, I've started buying my phones from Best Buy. I started looking into it when, you know, they gave me a job. But, they sealed the deal when they gave me a $200 gift card and a free TV when I upgraded last time. 
How weird that it's this year of all years.
I plan all my emergencies in Cancun.
Crime committed by gangs, white native citizens, but you and your right wing friends come crawling from the pits to spew your lies and propaganda.  We've had more violence from white hooligans in Sweden this year then car fires, more near sightings in towns them car fires...but don't let facts stop your ceaseless hate. 
Dude.... I used to ride freestyle BMX and Rocket League **totally** brings back some of those similar feelings.  I never realized that association before!
Send a message to the creator, Puttees.
Nice build :D   I personally don't see this as an expensive options in comparison to the other alternatives being offered.   3d printing is fun to play with but creates brittle results and takes ages.   Dwarven Forge is super expensive. You can create massive amounts of stuff with a mold and a bag of hydrastone.   I am a little biased though: http://downunderdm.blogspot.com.au/2016/03/tomb-of-horrors-3d-build-pictures-of.html
She got a free trip to Rio and was on national television. If it's not a bot, id consider it a success 
It appears to be Black Knot.
I think my gut reaction is to just hit the brakes...no turn at all.  Too many unknowns .
Our AMSA shop runs four 10 hour days a week and it's co-located with my unit. Honestly, I feel like 0900-1700, M-F is the norm for Depots like Anniston. At least that's what my cousin works as a tracked vehicle technician. 
You really do have to see how world quests work to understand fully. Each zone has their own rep associated to the quests, I.e. farondis for azsuna. So MOST of the world quests in Azsuna will give you farondis rep.
great site! great RB
 Everything about this story is disturbing and creepy. 
It's a sequel.
Le français s'apprend, l'anglais s'attrape.
No one makes my skin crawl like Christensen. His look, his views - everything about him is so vile.  
Do people not realize you're being sarcastic?
:(
Or a bot, check the comment history
This is something I was all for when rekoil went into alpha.  Unfortunately it was a total turd. 
All men indeed do sin. They start to sin quite early in life, but they do not sin at the beginning. Sin is transgression of the Law. It is not possible for an infant to transgress the Law.
This does work! So annoying though.
Fucking Voldemort.
Added.
awp itself is market
Nothing
Right after I get mine...Figures...Excuse me...  *slits her wrists and does push ups in a bathtub of warm water*
On slick cylinders.  
Ummmm, maybe not right now.
can you odd?
the only difference between a dog and a fox is a few drinks
For a long time I wasn't a cat person. A stray showed up and my wife wanted to add him to our family. She said I could name him - I decided to call him " Newman", after Jerry's nemesis on "Seinfeld".  Whenever I came into the room and our cat was there I'd say " Hellooo ... Newman !"  p.s. He won me over in a big way and he was a total Daddy's Boy.  We loved him for all his 19 years.
trump seems to be gaining supporters at an increasing rate. I remember when he had single-digit chances of winning. Now it almost seems like it could be a competition. The current trend of the graph on 538 terrifies me
Nah - and I actually found it - "B-Movie: Lust &amp; Sound in West-Berlin"
The thing is, a lot of people who can create things and currently aren't leeching off the system would probably end up just living off the basic income. When I first graduated from university, it too me about 3 months to find a job in my field. I had to get a crappy job to make ends meet. Had I been able to just mooch off the government I probably would have.  I really hated that job I had. I might have even tried less hard to get a job since I knew my expenses would be covered anyway.   Many families I know have both parents working, and almost all of one person's salary goes to paying for childcare. If they could stay at home to look after the kids and still make a few bucks from the government, they would definitely do it. I think that a lot of people underestimate just how many people only work their jobs because they have to, and would definitely take the option of not working if it was available.
I just played it safe and got it delivered for Friday. Then I've got Saturday and Sunday to pick it up so it works out well.
Drew Lynch from last season. Somehow made the top 2. And may I add that he placed over The Regurgitator who imo should have won that season.
Being a transfer student I wasn't aware that you could eat there. I thought it was only for meal plan people but I guess not. I'll definitely need to check it out. I've skipped lunch since class started because of the insanely long lines
Hmm should I expand the box lower then? because the gears are i1240, and only the weapons are i245.
Indeed. Though seeing things in colour definitely makes them seem more like real life, if that makes sense. 
Coward deleted his comment.  Let's downvote him moar kappa
Eh, even a good erotic novella isn't very good. I'm dying to my customer turned lover turning my lights out as he leaves.  Well fuck.
I feel like you watched History channel's marathon on Ancient Aliens 
Hi `alictrmods`. Thank you for participating in /r/Politics. However, [your submission](https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/50juq5/press_ignores_kaepernicks_hillary_for_prison/) has been removed for the following reason(s):  * [Off-Topic](http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/wiki/rulesandregs#wiki_the_.2Fr.2Fpolitics_on_topic_statement): All submissions to /r/politics need to be explicitly about **current US politics**.    If you have any questions about this removal, please feel free to [message the moderators.](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=/r/politics&amp;subject=Question regarding the removal of this submission by /u/alictrmods&amp;message=I have a question regarding the removal of this [submission.](https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/50juq5/press_ignores_kaepernicks_hillary_for_prison/?context=10000\))
Bell
The theme tune better stay the same too.
Lol I left that in there. Kids these days always have to be right!
I've seen a few of your posts lately. Everyone is unnecessarily negative and bitter. Stop posting if you are not going to say anything constructive to the conversation. 
&gt;  When I need to wake up I get these.   so like, every day?
That's how I drive as well. I didn't take away from the video that you're supposed to pay any attention to the car behind, only the one in front
Yeah I was thinking the same.
I didn't say they were being harassed pm the streets, I said your much less likely to be harassed where I'm from. Yes there are people killed for no reason. Did you not see the black guy choked to death relatively recently? The black kid who was shot to death?i don't agree with the way black lives matter operates but do you think they just randomly decided to pop up? 
Love the mess. 
What do you mean by 'shut down'?
mhmm....well i don't really have to much to say about that xD, guess i play my Geralt and Ciri too nicely and i start to think of that as Canon.....probably also quite a difference from book-game characters from what i've gathered...
Yeah, the dude had a modeling career before he worked for the NSA.  Why is that a character flaw?
Here's the full article:  Kurds Carve Out a Home in Syria, Testing U.S. Ties With Turkey  Rojava has four million people and its own constitution, alarming Turkey and some of its own people  By Raja Abdulrahim and Dion Nissenbaum Updated Aug. 31, 2016 1:31 p.m. ET  AMUDA, Syria—Amid the chaos of Syria’s war, the Kurds have carved out a semiautonomous region called Rojava that is home to about four million people, is as big as Belgium and stretches nearly the full length of the 565-mile border between Syria and Turkey.  The emergence of Rojava also has added complexity to a region in turmoil, bringing resistance from outside and dissent from within.  Rojava’s continuing territorial expansion has alarmed Turkey, which is battling Kurdish separatists within its own borders and has pushed deeper into Syria to attack Islamic State forces and rein in the Syrian Kurds. The U.S. is stuck uncomfortably in the middle because it relies on Syrian Kurds to fight Islamic State yet considers Turkey a crucial ally.  And as Rojava gets mightier and realizes long-held ambitions of self-rule for Kurds, some of its own people feel alienated by what they claim are heavy-handed tactics that feel reminiscent of the Syrian regime.  Instead of helping Jude Hamo finish his junior year of college, his parents sold the family car and borrowed money to smuggle the 23-year-old to Germany so he wouldn’t be drafted into the Kurdish armed forces fighting Islamic State. “We chose the lesser of two evils,” says Jude’s father, Radwan.  Since late 2014, at least 6,000 young Syrian Kurds have been compelled to serve in the military, according to the regional administration’s military ministry. More than two dozen died in battle.  In addition, the opposition group Syrian Network for Human Rights said Rojava officials have arrested and forced into military service a total of 1,178 civilians, including 217 minors and 69 women.  “Everyone has to participate,” said Akram Hisso, former head of the Kurdish administration’s executive council in one of the three Syrian provinces that form the self-proclaimed Rojava. “Those who come out against the draft can go and sit in European refugee camps.”  Other sources of criticism include how the Kurdish administration, which established itself in early 2014, has cracked down on dissent, introduced an ideological school curriculum and consolidated power among one political party.  Kurdish leaders say the draft, which has led to an exodus of young men like Mr. Hamo, and other policies are necessities in the fight against Islamic State.  Other signs of Rojava’s self-rule abound, from its opening of foreign offices in France, Germany, Sweden and Moscow to a constitution that embraces secularism and women’s rights.  Rojava has hardened de facto lines of control that are accelerating Syria’s fragmentation. The country is partitioned between the Assad regime, Islamic State, rebel groups and Syrian Kurds, with each group trying to implement its own ideology and vision of governance.  In neighboring Iraq’s Kurdistan, recognized by the central government as an autonomous region since 2005, real independence remains elusive. Kurdistan wrestles with the Iraqi central government for a share of Iraq’s budget, and Iraqi Kurdish leaders regularly threaten to secede.  After decades of being marginalized under Syrian President Bashar al-Assad and his late father, the Kurds were allowed by Syria’s authoritarian regime to have some self-rule as part of a strategy to keep them from joining the uprising that began in March 2011 and morphed into civil war.  Government troops withdrew from historically Kurdish cities and towns in northeast Syria, and the Kurds then expanded their territory through conquests of land that had been seized by Islamic State.  The ethnic minority’s growing power has become a concern for the Assad regime, which launched airstrikes in mid-August on Kurdish forces in the northeastern city of Hasakah. In a written statement about the fighting, the Syrian army used language linking the Kurdish forces with a militant group designated by the U.S. and Turkey as a terrorist organization.  Last week, Turkey supported Syrian rebels in a surprising cross-border offensive into northwestern Syria. The assault was aimed at pushing Islamic State forces from a strategic border town and halting the territorial gains of U.S.-backed Kurdish militants known as the YPG.  U.S. officials say they have made clear to Kurdish forces that American military backing isn’t equivalent to an endorsement of their political ambitions.  Officials were angered when the YPG, viewed as the U.S.’s most effective fighting force against Islamic State, seized more territory during the recent Manbij offensive than they agreed to beforehand, according to Vice President Joe Biden.  Still, military support from the U.S. has stirred Kurdish aspirations and strained America’s relationship with Turkey, a critical ally.  “It was kind of a short-term tactical decision that could have longer-term strategic downsides, all in the name of saying we were making progress on Islamic State,” says Robert Ford, the U.S. ambassador to Syria when the uprising started.  In March, Syrian Kurds announced the formation of a federation of Rojava’s three regions in an assertion of self-rule. “Rojava will be the basis of establishing a federalist system in Syria,” said Mr. Hisso. Washington and other Western governments rejected the move.  Throughout Rojava, long-omnipresent photographs and statues of Syrian President Bashar al-Assad and his late father have been replaced by banners of YPG fighters killed in battle. Many Rojava residents call them martyrs.  In the center of Amuda, a traffic circle adorned with a waving statue of Hafez al-Assad until it was torn down by protesters now has a statue of a woman who holds up a flame and carries a book and a few stalks of wheat. She is Rojava’s own Lady Liberty.  Behind the displays of independence, however, is an enduring dependence on the Syrian regime. The Kurdish administration relies on the regime to pay the majority of civil-servant salaries, issue high-school and college diplomas, and run the region’s airport.  Opposition parties say Kurdish leaders have arrested and beaten dissenters and shut down rival party headquarters. Rojava officials also banned two independent media outlets from operating freely. Elections originally scheduled for 2014 have been repeatedly postponed.  “Anything that has the hint of not working for their benefit, they ban it,” says Imaad Omar Yusuf, general coordinator for the opposition Kurd Youth Movement. “Seventy percent of Kurds are against them.”  On Aug. 13, Rojava’s police force arrested the president of the Kurdish National Council, an umbrella group of opposition parties, deported him to Iraq and threatened to kill him if he returns, the group said in a statement.  Sinam Mohamad, foreign representative for Rojava, denies that anyone has been arrested or threatened because they are political dissenters. People detained or deported were guilty of criminal offenses, she says.  The independent media outlets were engaged in “intelligence gathering” and “antagonizing the autonomous administration,” Ms. Mohamad adds. “And this is against the law.”  (Part 1/2, continued below)
Definitely lol
Okay but that's not the question OP is asking at all lol
Techies, just in case anyone on either team randoms.
If you have any fields that you are interested in, I'm going to encourage you to reach out to anyone who might work in those fields. People are often really happy to talk about their careers and many will let you job shadow for a day. I've had to do a lot of that for my future career (required for the program), and it's been so useful to me to see how it works in the real world. In spite of how the internet behaves, I've had so many people be supportive and encouraging. Reach out to research. The worst someone can say is no. I hope you find something that you like. 
It has become a staple of my camping supplies
Amazing work man, rarely do we find updated and detailed guides on a fan site for an MMO. &amp;nbsp;  The thing is I dont want to become a meatshield/buffbot and nothing more. I have grouped with a brawler that did 1.5mill dps on ABNM  2nd boss . I cant compete with that even with my buffs. He had similar gear than me except his weapon was +15.  &amp;nbsp;  And yes I agree with you, I get rekt every time I face a new boss because I dont know if I should be blocking his next attack or not. Sometimes I hold my shield up for too long and end up wasting time because the boss decided to turn around or he falls on the ground (is this a mechanic?)  &amp;nbsp;  As for for blocking is it better to eat some hits to my face while continue my rotation or stop my rotation and block to get a counter? Ofcourse I am talking about non lethal hits   Also if I block 2 hits in a row counter will be on CD after my 2nd block, do I wait for it to come up and use it or should I continue my rotation?
Just another Seiko SNZH mod  https://imgur.com/a/sGFnt
I am envious I've been locked out of mine for too many failed password attempts &amp;:/
Outstanding.
Under "new table and graph" use the XY option. The demo plot that they show (in prism 6, at least) looks just like what you have sketched out.  Then you can set things up like:  http://imgur.com/a/5iB44  Highlight your cells and change the color, and do the same for the colleague. There are no visible error bars because I put in small standard deviations for the example data.
The Mistakes of the Obama...
I know you're desperately trying to come across as edgy, but it's really not working. You live in Toronto, stop crying about the injustices of our by-and-large very decent police force, it just makes you look like you're in Grade 10 and took your first social studies course. 
Question for those sensitive to tocopherol: do you use vitamin c serums, and if so, which ones? It seems that all the nice, stable, effective serums have tocopherol (including both Timeless and Skinceuticals). Is the tocopherol in a high enough concentration to irritate your skin, or do you resort to something else?
It would have been a muffin ring anyway. Donuts. Are. Fried.
All of us still gonna call u bitchtits. The name callin ain't gonna stop and /r/steroids has 0 safe spaces 
Awesome buddy I'm from EU is that ok?
"screw cocaine and meth, the real money is in epipens and insulin"
Immortal =/= Invincible................
You absolutely could, assuming you could find one that someone has stashed in a barn somewhere. It would also be cheaper at that point to rig up a reloading setup to load 30mm blanks, which would still be awesome.  My buddy that owns the tank in the video I linked above [also has a minigun](http://youtu.be/BgYde8m_1p8), which is freakin' sweet, so if the fun is proportional to round size, then I imagine that shooting a GAU-8 would be better than sex with Scarlett Johansson.
It will work, but I'd put it under the drip tip to avoid inhaling it. It'll probably cut down on the airflow too.
Why not?
Its his stream and he will listen to what he wants to.
lol
Original meme 10/10
Radish is really good as a potato substitute in soups and stews. I put whole (small) radishes in my beef stew and you wouldn't know they weren't potatoes.
So you can easily extract bullets from their casings, not to mention that you can just go out and buy loose bullets for reloading (a very common and popular practice/hobby) And it's way more logical that someone put a loose bullet in an already existing *completely penetrated* bullet hole for reference. You are also extrapolating some incredible information from this image, brick ground = Ukraine apparently? Idk man, it really seems like you're talking out of your ass.
Wrong website
&gt;I guess every company that doesn't explicitly state they won't be evil is just up to no good then!  Of course not. Don't be silly.  Also, I didn't say that.
Right. Same difference. The mexican's pay.
PSA: Buy neither of these. The flashlight itself is terrible and cheaply built and rife with inaccuracies 
I could have written this post - I remember my father counting the days until I'd turn 18 off a calendar.   This is why I have so many issues with the common trope of millenials mooching off their parents or moving back in to save on rent. Some of us need jobs that can support us the minute we're out of high school, which can be infinitely complicated in this new economy. When I was kicked out I was from a country that was hit extremely hard by the recession. Luckily I gtfo and made it.
Are those TÜV approved peppers, sir?
Does this mean, in-canon, Titan AI is advancing? Like, full-scale intelligence, not just a smart assistant? 
.
Lurkers
I'm sure the only people you've blown are victims of child sexual abuse. 
She gave attitude this am going to school
If it were under other circumstances I would have asked her to leave but it was one of those things where we both knew it wasn't going to work out even though we both really like each other. If the relationship happened at a different time in our lives it may have worked out but we werent ready to be in a full blown relationship right now.
Schools I can understand because the busses could have issues getting through flooded streets.  Our daycare has no issues with flooding.  There's absolutely no reason for them to be closed tomorrow.  
If you can show me a more competitive country in the EU for multinational investment in IT and Pharma than Ireland, even with its 12.5% corp tax implemented, go ahead.
I NEED AN IMAGE OF THIS NAQUIN SHIRT. 
P I C K U P Y O U R T R A S H
Alles klar, bis morgen dann im Livestream :)
Just picked two of the green wingback chairs and four orange Herman Miller shell chairs. Three of the four have swivel seat attachment marked HM 113. Never saw the wingback chairs before and had to have them. Only problem is can't find a base for them. Have seen a rocking chair style and regular base types. Any ideas as to where I can find the Peabody base? These are for sale so message me if any one interested
I am heading to work. (Curse you, retail night shifts.) Cheer just a bit harder to make up for me not being there!
Depends how you define waste.
THATS THE BOTTOM LINE, CAUSE STONE COLD SAID SO. 
It would be cool if they found it below winterfell 
MentallyGiant
These were stipulations for some of the progressive policies on the Democratic platform. Unfortunately, the platform will be shelved and democratics will continue to be centrists/corporatist as usual.  Bernie made a terrible deal here. The goal was to get progressives elected and change the democratic party. By doing this, establishment democrats still run the party. It's especially worse because DWS is the face of everything wrong with democracy and the fact that she can still win despite being the most corrupt politician within the democratic party sets a bad precedence.
I always assume it's just a ploy to meet Devgru guys.
Can we get Ike Davis to do the eugoogley?
No need to
The problem of not having an internet connection or GPS on your phone also didn't bother multiple generations of people. Neither did not having an internet connection at all. Or not having any form of telecommunication. Market demands change as technology advances. Perhaps high-capacity storage wasn't in demand during the time of the DS and people accepted that hauling their games was a fact of life, but that was back in 2004. Demands have changed, as you can tell by the DSi which allowed SD cards. High-capacity storage has been a fact of multimedia devices ever since around the time smartphones became popular, and was pretty much mandatory by 2012. You see why offering expandable memory at an exorbitant price is a problem, especially when the competitor allows you to use much cheaper third-party memory?
Only real answer. The rest sound like a bunch of pre-service teachers in an Ed class.   Fuck her and fuck that school is that's how it works. You're a teacher. There's literally a job in every town in America. Get the fuck out of there. 
If the air/water position is important, then the straw effect isn't a good example. I guess then I'd ask, why does the straw hold water but the upside down bottle doesn't? 
 [As a reminder, this subreddit is for civil discussion.](https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/wiki/rulesandregs#wiki_please_be_civil)  * Do not call other users trolls, morons, children, or anything else clever you may think of. [Personal attacks, whether explicit or implicit, are not permitted.](https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/wiki/rulesandregs#wiki_no_personal_attacks)  * Do not accuse other users of being shills. If you believe that a user is a shill, the proper conduct is to report the user or send us a modmail.  * In general, don't be a jerk. Don't bait people, don't use hate speech, etc. Attack ideas, not users.  * Do not downvote comments because you disagree with them, and be willing to upvote quality comments whether you agree with the opinions held or not.  Incivility results in escalating bans from the subreddit. If you see uncivil comments, please report them and do not reply with incivility of your own.  ***   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/politics) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Just an Aquila ad.  **WHAT ABOUT AQUORA?!?!**
I believe he'll be among the greats (for me they are Marshall, Hadlee, Akram, Lillee) unless he massively drops off in his twilight years of his career.  His stats right now are incredibly impressive.
(The critique doesn't have to be 2000+ words! And I think that as long as you've clearly made an effort, it should be fine.)
Great work
Speaking of The Constitution: Do you think that the 1st Amendment would look the same if you took a time machine and told The Founding Fathers that there will be this massive, monolithic, unchecked and unregulated media company with an audience of 1.71 billion people (a quarter of the planet's population)? I don't. The freedom of association and peaceful assembly could be easily extended and modernized to include the biggest social networks.
Hey!  We have a collection thread every Thursday (so not long until it goes up), please share this there instead.  We find that otherwise purchased take over the sub.  Thank you
things run privately (as opposed to by the government) are generally cheaper and more efficient. This is the case in almost every single instance of comparing government vs. the private sector. 
How do you figure it's the wrong approach?  It has worked in other places.  It's forcing Alberta to change for the future because if we still rely entirely on oil, we're going to be completely fucked in 20 or 30 years when consumption begins to drop.
Ah look sure in 25 years or more those jobs might cover that 13 billion. 
Quick's not elite.
Thanks! Leaving off the dealer's face up card and simplifying the aces were design choices that I thought made the presentation better. Feel free to fiddle around with it and add those if you'd like to see them in action / learn some Python in the process
Ive tried mapping out when an uncommon or rare will pop out in a given spot. I feel that that minute of each hour is just when a Pokemon spawns, not necessarily the Pokemon you want.
I do not disagree with you, but it sounds like you support the Canadian middle class having it's wealth siphoned off via Free Trade to be redistributed amongst the new working class in another country while the income of the ruling class keeps rising.  Trade is great, but it's not an on or off switch of either all Free Trade or all protectionism... there is a place of mutually beneficial trade in there as well.  Again you are right that we are all bullies and will exploit group we can to get ahead... that is why we need our government to protect us from the other bully nations.  You seem to be saying that we have no right to our resources or social advantages and need to allow anyone on the globe to access them to be fair to everyone.  Becoming poor and voiceless like most of the worlds working class just so we are then in harmony is not my plan for the next generation.
---  &gt; &gt; **http://imgur.com/a/myIAb** &gt;  ---   *I am a bot whose sole purpose is to improve the timeliness and accuracy of responses in this subreddit.*   ---   **It appears you forgot to include your location in the title or body of your post.**   **Please update the original post to include this information.**   ***Do NOT delete this post - Instead, simply edit the post with the requested information.*.**   ---   [Report Inaccuracies Here](https://www.reddit.com/r/LocationBot/) | [GitHub] (https://github.com/ianpugh/LocationBot2.0) | [Author](https://reddit.com/u/ianp) | [LocationBot Statistics (Not Mobile Friendly)](https://locationbot.info) | LocationBot v2.1.1   ---   Original Post:   Author: /u/MoldyTheGreat   **23 y/o who was just by drunk driver looking for advice on next steps** &gt;Basically what the title says &gt;  &gt; A few nights ago I was heading to a friends house when I was hit head on by another vehicle. I was looking in my rear view to change lanes one second, the next I see headlights coming at me. We were both going about 45-50mph. Both cars were smashed in to where the engines began, so you could say totaled.  &gt;  &gt; Scary shit.  &gt;  &gt; By the grace of God we both survived with relatively minor injuries, when you consider the alternative. I thought I had a fractured pelvis, but I have deep bone bruises on both hips, cracked rib on the right side, my thigh is numb and I can't figure out why let after 3 days, and a host of other joint and muscle pain and discomfort. I can walk but very gingerly. &gt;  &gt; Anyway, as this has never happened to me before I was wondering if legal action should be taken and if so what exactly the process would be and anything else about this subject that anyone has any knowledge of I would like to know
It's just the default controller I got with my console! I googled and apparently it might be a sensor issue and that some guns require you to hold the trigger in further than others and therefore it's not registering it at all. Strange!!
The entire purpose of the money being in Ireland is so that the US cannot tax it at all. 0%. So we don't care 
None sense 
I got this today. Haven't been paid yet. Hopefully they provide a detailed breakdown when they pay us. If not I'll ask for one.
It wasn't working for me earlier but now it is. Maybe try closing it and reopening?
I've had my ship stolen a few times, i just laugh and ask for a pick up in the chat and 9/10 people come to help. No idea what servers OP plays on but i've hardly seen any griefing or bad play
If you have any outdoor stores they sell cordage by the foot for cheap. I got some bungee cord that's very good quality for deck rigging kayaks and I was shocked at how little I payed. 
&gt;there must not be enough to lead if he is joining us along with other solx.  I don't care if you guys enjoy flinging petty insults at each other, but as soon as you bring me into this, at the very least have the respect to not use me as ammunition against my own outfit. It is my own personal choice where and with whom I play. Yes, I have joined with 56RD on different occasions and for various reasons. But don't assume to draw negative conclusions about my outfit because of that. Or at the least, be respectful enough not to include me as an arguing chip in your insults.   Thanks.
lul using cheat commands in an inhouse league on stream as a joke. im sure he cheats on ever LAN must explain how he always lands his sunstrikes. 
What the heck is Massachusetts doing with Connecticut's river in the first place?
Your second paragraph is gold. I didn't realize we have a petting zoo nearby... And I do have a friend with a llama farm!  These are really great ideas, thank you!  Right, the home events would have to wait at this point. Trying to get there! :)
You're not alone. I can only watch the Superbowl and a handful of Mizzou games. I definitely find it more entertaining now then I used to, but I think it's as boring as most of my friends probably think baseball is.
we're dead already
463645306  Instalauncher.  It's such an awesome tweak which I'd love to have but because I'm under 18 and my parents I can't buy anything online.  All of your tweaks look awesome but this one is my favorite.  Thanks for doing this awesome giveaway!
This is kind of random but the Dutch league implemented 12 subs on the bench this year. A lot of those teams also have B teams that play in the 2nd division. I don't think the combination is going to end well because IRL a lot of the fringe players will play for the B team but also sit on the subs bench for the A team. I don't think the AI will handle it that way so they'll either have huge squads (like 30-35 players) with half of the players never getting any playing time, or they'll keep smaller squads but not use the 12 subs realistically.
Not an exchange student, but I think it's reasonable to assume that it's far more intimidating for him being in a foreign country and not knowing how to deal with the natives. If anything, he'd probably appreciate someone engaging with him. 
amen!
Instead of homebrew, install nvm:  - https://github.com/creationix/nvm  Then you can `nvm install version` like `nvm install 6.5.0` and have that applied to your current shell.  For projects, a good rule of thumb is to follow Heroku's supported versions (which follow official releases by about 5 minutes). They support the LTS versions and the Stable versions:  - https://devcenter.heroku.com/articles/nodejs-support#supported-runtimes  Start new projects with a Stable version that will be mainlined into an LTS version. Right now, that's 6. Next, it'll be 8.
Have you been served with a summons and complaint from Stoic Studio yet?
Rather than continue talking back and forth (feel free to PM me) I think creating discourse here is less likely to create more attention that the regular readers of the Toronto Sun.  Sure some people may not have seen the article before in /r/toronto - but the point of this post was to gauge whether or not the overall community believes this is appropriate.  We can be a catalyst of change. I do not regularly visit the toronto sun, however in a google search it game up.  The question was whether or not this is appropriate or fair to the person. 
It depends on the player, really. One of my regulars is the type who will drive himself up the wall trying to figure out what the empty corridor is hiding from him, while another (know-it-all) player has a great memory for the small lore bits I love to throw out, so having NPCs get things wrong bugs him in and out of character and makes him instantly dislike that person.
I was thinking a warm grey for the walls - [this page](http://www.houzz.com/ideabooks/44305132/list/color-of-the-week-decorating-with-warm-gray) has some nice ones. I like that color because it doesn't feel too overwhelming in a small space, but it's more interesting than white.   Track lighting could work. If you do that, I think you'll definitely want some artwork or something else on the walls, so it isn't the first thing that your eye is drawn to. 
That actually sounds pretty cool, it's a shame it hasn't worked well.
[STRAIGHT FIIIYAAH](https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/236x/c8/6b/0a/c86b0ab8f2ea3d8986908f4f2bacb3d9.jpg)
hes down 200 g's of m and is offered a half refund??  hmmm
You should do a Google image search for "ostrich ride"
Same principle as the fish tank bridge, just in a larger scale: https://youtu.be/6RnorkCkEqI
I don't think it's very cool of your friend to be having a guest who doesn't contribute. This seems to have been the problem from the start  
Ostriches aren't native to Australia. We have [emus.](https://lh4.googleusercontent.com/proxy/H2IKclmLlMhd-1cTPyuv3l4djzV9Mbfp3MS-tDZpJY2VfF2-06i9ICRAzA1s0o-e6bz00KbwdvseQ-Vim9-CLcbRhWgOmuWlxUK7O8wvELRVia_hDuqc2A=w443-h332-nc)
No Walter, you're not wrong. You're just an asshole 
You said what kind and I say anykind. I watch any kind of film which I find interseting from Parody to Romance or gory Horrors. 
1.  What does being aussie have to do with you not carrying around a mexican flag? 2.  You only know about being butt hurt, because you're a cuckold.  That's probably why you drive a miata.
es bueno
OHIP doesn't cover any medication at all unless you're in hospital.  I don't know about the waiting period when moving (that sounds very un-Canadian, IMO, are you covered by NB for that time?)  Your best bet would be, if you don't have a job, see if Ontario Works can help you, and if you do have a job that pays well, I guess hope you get benefits?  Sorry, it's kinda shitty, and honestly I didn't know any province covered medication, that'd be awesome.
I did change those db options but forgot to mention it.  There doesn't appear to be anything in either wp-config or .htaccess that would be causing this.
I agree.
Black and black. Or white and black. Or patterned black and white top and black.   Or two different colors and/or patterns of similar saturation (color deepness) to the stripe in back.
My bad its Hauged Up, the underscore was from email accounts and stuff
what advantage is there to 3 manning it? 
NOICE!
if you already have to download the project you might as well run "xcodebuild -project"
#¡CONSTRUIR LA PARED!
Yup, mine were pretty off as well.. 
My Beautiful Dark Twisted Fantasy isnt just the best Kanye albums, its one of the best albums ever. Its so masterfully produced. TLOP is also pretty good.
I'm not a good sneaker spotter but I swore the white ones were LBJ's w the straps?
I was hoping that that little scene where Lace goes, "ugh, I can't stand her" about Caila would be elaborated on, but it also just passed without further screen time. 
Just because you fuck over peoples lives, never stay concistent and follow your own defined rules. Just because you steal, smear and sabotage all of your competitors and people you dislike. Overpower independent organizations and bully them into submission. Sabotage 3rd party personalities and organizations chance to become successful. Lie to your oblivious fanbase 24/7. Don't take any responsibility for your actions and use every dirty trick in the book to appear to be the "good guy" doesn't mean that you are evil.   Also bonus point for being the most hypocritical gaming dev company, telling and bruteforcing everyone to be 'non-toxic' in their language-use and behaviour. And then being the biggest bully in the industry yourself, and on top of that, acting like you are on the fucking moral-highround. Stay classy, Riot.
Yeah, Trump should try to lawyer his way out of this. That won't come off as pathetic, or anything. 
Tony needs knee lasers.
ED marketing didn't post what they claimed were "in-game" videos showing things that didn't exist on launch.    NMS marketing posted what they claimed were "in-game" videos showing things that just flat-out didn't exist at launch and still don't.
flames
Well there you go, then. My bad. I didn't think he had that many ABs leading off.
WA has a long way to go before it reaches CA levels of hysteria. It at least is a must permit state.  Source: live in CA but work in WA and so spend most of my time there. I can now CC just about everywhere but where I pay a mortgage.
When you say WoD got it right, do you mean actual WoD or the Invasion events?
I've never been more infuriated at something so satisfying.
So you wanna it? Or nah
Perfect sense. Thanks for the advice on this and I'll start right away with some longer tempos. I'm sure Pfitz covers how to determine pace for tempo runs but for now does just starting at 7:05/mile (race pace) sound reasonable?
Wheres playoff mode?!
Yeah that's really what I was getting at... a few crucial job interviews going your way can give you a much different day to day life than if they didn't, and attractiveness plays a role in that. Pretty alone won't cut it, but pretty definitely gives you an edge.
You're not alone. There's a great story about the original composer, Jerry Goldsmith:  &gt; When the Imagineers were looking for a composer to create the underscore for "Soarin' Over California," they invited Jerry Goldsmith out to Glendale to take a look at the work-in-progress version of this DCA ride film. They sent Goldsmith up into WDI's mock-up theater to view the "Soarin' " movie. When they brought him back down again, these Imagineers were shocked to find Jerry weeping. Huge tears rolling down his face.  &gt;"Had something gone wrong?" the Imagineers asked. "No, everything was fine," Goldsmith said. He then went on to explain that he had two loves in his life: Music and flying. In fact, some of his favorite memories as a child was flying gliders with his Dad down among on the dunes where LAX was eventually built.  &gt;Goldsmith, a native born Californian, had been composing music for TV and movies for 45 years at this point. Here -- finally -- was his dream project. A film that would combine his two loves -- music &amp; flying -- as well as pay tribute to his home state.  &gt;Jerry, as it turns out, had been weeping because he was happy. He thought that the "Soarin' Over California" ride film was beautiful, magical. "I'd do anything to be part of this project," Goldsmith continues, "I'd even score the film for free."  &gt;Just for the record, Disney *DID* pay Jerry to work on the project. The end result -- the perfect marriage of all that incredible in-flight footage as well as Goldsmith's majestic score -- is perhaps DCA's very best attraction.  He passed away in 2004, just a few years after the attraction opened.
You gave me the vision of the day this game releases and we all meet up in our hangars to wish all the bugs and general evilness of ptu will go away. Dreams.
This is from Mount Sugarloaf in South  Deerfield.
I'm not seeing why it's a disastrous pr stunt, what your reasoning?
Ok I will say it...BOGFPO just doesn't ring my bell.  Let's DV the shit out of this and forget it happened and you can come back with a real discount.
We had a snow game 2 years ago that was so much fun till the end, where the score changed like 4 times in 5mins
CAPTAIN OUTRAGEOUS BAREBACKING A BISON  WEW LAD 
Trans, besides mana problem, is only good on Thor, Susano, Bastet, Cupid and Neith. 
yolo
I'd ask him "so tHat's your wHole tHang?"   Edit: fixed H
Yeah, like they aren't in a fucking dictionary man. The word you *do* get to choose that doesn't have to be in a dictionary is your name, your noun. Not your pronoun. If you want your name to be like Xe or Xer or Xerantha or Psyclo? Fucking go for it. I don't want to have to learn 8 different pronouns for everyone I know though. Literally had to learn like 4 but one just changed so now it's like 6, how often is it going to change too?!
Ill give you the password to my common room and you can visit any time! 😍😍😍 (lame Harry Potter reference lol)
Not sure why you're trashing the DM - it's a decent rag with huge circulation, and it's telling a story here that needs to be told. Stevie is a quintessential sociopath.
his grin would be on the inside
http://pasteall.org/blend/index.php?id=43328
No. It's been said by the creators of the show that Monty didn't create Maidens until after V2. They would have been brought up before V3 if it were otherwise.
This post was removed by AutoModerator for not providing enough content and information for a valid discussion. Have a question? Submit it in one of our weekly questions threads!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Battlefield) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Thanks! It took me a while to make it and I had to make sure I used the right clips and stuff. I just wanted to make a video about Peridot after thinking about how much she really changed and her character developed. I feel like I should have included some clips from Message Received, though. That was the episode where she officially became a crystal gem. o3o
Aren't there anatomy scans that do this? Or is this the anatomy scan people talk about when they know what they're having?
If they could tell them apart do you think there's be so many shootings of unarmed people by police?
They definitely look better from farther away. I thought I wouldn't like them either but I think they're great 
3.
Yeah I figured that out right after posting this...
maj :)  By the way, be careful with your capital letters; there are no vapital t:s in romanized tlhIngan Hol, so it's always **veS toQ**, never *veS ToQ* :)
A war almost started in the trenches over whether we should play Taylor Swift or Viking Metal during the dig.  People took sides, there were shouting matches.... it was intense.
&gt;memetic need before  &gt;(bummed the Yachty show is sold out tonight) This was on purpose right
Wait, were can I find the episodes? 
It's a smaller company that talks big. They do an impressive amount of revenue for a smaller company though.   I'm prepared to spend as much as I need but Still waiting to hear what their actual claims are for the case. 
I like how Trump couldn't even muster "Most of them are good people." He had to have "Some of them" and then put another thing doubting that with "I assume"
I'm tall and my special friend is bigger than average, so I got that going for me
Yes exactly. In the future I plan to go into greater detail, but this episode is meant to be an answer that has little to no spoilers so newer fans will be able to know to look for him. But he might be the most powerful and most important character in the Cosmere. 
Water fountains 
InstaLaumcher!   #467933251  Would be so handy to have and make life so much simpler.  Nice giveaway btw :)
I will! 
Unfortunately I think it's just a text glitch because his finishing hasn't sky rocketed
Why bring religion into this? I'm an atheist.
Precisely, with a two year probational period you would have a chance to drive under all weather conditions to see how your vehicle handles, see how the Nordic countries exam their drivers, someone has their ducks in a row.   I hate racing games (and taxes) because their is no feel, but just like pilots have flight simulators, how hard would it be to make a realistic simulator where you sit in a car and have 360 screens. Can input whatever car, truck or semi you want, dump truck etc. input weather, input tire wear/ tread depth, input bad alignment angles. Anything!  Out of curiosity, where are the idiots you have to deal with ? I grew up in the bay area CA... horrible drivers, I reside in DFW TX, still horrible. How do you wreck in the HOV lane? Must be hard as hell to drive between two walls 20ft apart in a 6ft wide vehicle. /s
So if Hillary wins and Trump dies do we annoint this guy or what?
I tried but page wouldn't load.....dam censorship. Can't even get on the list now.
Every day of my freaking life 
The 3 crowns idk
Bone atrophy is actually very well documented with astronauts in zero gravity. Happens crazy fast.   You don't want to kill your knees,but you want to stay active. As with anything, moderation is key
i tend to only USE things when i have to (or want to).  I don't HAVE to level up my espers to complete the current content. So why would i want to spend my megacite now on something when i can save it for later?  Every esper will eventually get maxed out anyway like /u/bbatardo said and you will eventually be hoarding all magacite anyway. so why not save the ones you dont need to use now for later.  Again, it's not like we NEED every esper at 2*lv30 to complete any content. so what's the big hurry to get there?
Sometimes you must HURT in order to KNOW, FALL in order to GROW, LOSE in order to GAIN, because life's greatest lessons are learned through PAIN.
Does FFXV have classes? I doubt.
Makes sense. He was going to be snatched via Rule-5 anyways.  He has a chance to be a good role player/4th outfielder type. Great kid with good plate discipline. Hope he finds a role over there.
I hear the controllers work with OSVR, but it has a bug that prevents headset tracking in Linux currently. 
Might just need to tell your parents no and that you want to be your own person and find your own happiness
Well, it's not like just anyone is out making breakthroughs in biomedical research and drug development for neurological disorders. You're welcome to go and develop your own theraputic, and decline the patent. 
I don't think so, I just asked what time they expect us to be there by and they said 7:30. I think they might only call if there's a lot of people expected and they'd like us to be there earlier than usual
I would buy a pair of good coil overs or you'll end up doing more damage to the car than the difference in price. Maybe not now, but eventually.
I'd say get the XPS 15. Best best of both worlds. Can still get the core later.
I CAN'T STAND BLINK SHOTGUN PUSSIES! WISH THEY HAD A GAME TYPE WITHOUT SHOTGUNS!!!!!
Lady you evil
trololololol
Start by canceling the -21 with the 7, leaving a -3 in the numerator. Then cancel the x's, leaving x^6 in the denominator. Then cancel the y's, but be careful since you have a negative exponent. y^9 / y^-3 = y^9 / (1 / y^3 ) = y^12 , so you have y^12 in the numerator. This leaves you with (-3y^12 /  x^6 )^3 . Raise the top and bottom to the third power, and you have the answer. -3^3 = -27, (y^12 )^3 = y^36 , and (x^6 )^3 = x^18 . 
Wut
I would kill myself because I can't take the pressure of the decision of what my last thing will be.
It was a joke
Tigo
In The Chase you're in a team of four people and each person gets the chance to get money for the whole team or get eliminated.  They have a quickfire round where people get £1,000 per question. Most people rack up an average of about £6,000 - £8,000.  After that your amount gets placed on a 'board' and for each question you answer correctly you move one space on the board closer to 'home'. Once you get it home your money is added to the pool of the whole team.  However, there's a person (provided by the show) called the Chaser who is on the 'board' as well and whose job it is to catch up to you. If you answer too many questions incorrectly they catch up to you and you're eliminated.  When your money amount is first placed on the board you are offered two other amounts of money. A lower amount in order to move one space close to home, or a higher amount if you move one space closer to the Chaser.  The problem here is most people who get maybe £6,000 - £8,000 in the quickfire round are offered about £3,000 or £4,000 to move one space closer to home. But, people who maybe only get £1,000 are often offered a negative amount of money to move that one space closer. It's a dick move, especially considering the negative amount would take money from the WHOLE team pool and not just you.
So you mention it and yet some point you're trying to make about the US healthcare system is somehow mine? Tell me more about how great the Finns are at crafting arguments.   You're ignorant of cost because you think it means what the consumer pays at the point of service.  You're ignorant of free because you don't understand cost.
This content brought to you from "Taiwan Pool"  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#off site feed "Taiwan Pool")
And thank you for replying in a civilised manner, have a good day :)
Seyda Neen is a swamp-ass shithole. It's a dumping ground for exiles. Imagine it prior to Vvardenfel's opening; four mud huts and maybe the lighthouse was there for Vivec City's sake (why aren't there any more lighthouses on the island?), populated by some crab-skewers and fishers. It's nothing, it's not even Hla Oad. Every other building was built to service Imperial interests, and even then you have smugglers operating within spitting distance in Addamasartus, on an island to the west/northwest, and over the hill east of Pelagiad. Do the C&amp;E officials line their pockets? I'm not saying they don't. You also have unofficial guards like Hrisskar harassing settlers with no official action by the local judiciary. Shit, you got a Legion Champion who can't even be bothered to get off his ass and retrieve a legendary artifact himself.   There isn't even a well here! Do these people drink from the bogs? The Sea of Ghosts has got to be salt water, being connected to the Abecean and extraordinarily salty considering the ash-heavy soil that gets dump in it with constant annual rainfall and ash-storms.   Oh, right, the bogs! It smells like rotting vegetation and nix-shit. I bet stupid fauna get stuck in those bogs and die slowly and stinkily. Christ on a cracker, this place sucks! It stinks, it's probably humid, it rains all the time...my god, it's Florida. Seyda Neen isn't just Vehk's basement, it's his toilet. Not even the Hist want to be there, how many argonians do you see hanging around? Like three in the entire Bitter Coast. I bet Ascadian Isle slaves feel bad for Bitter Coast slaves. It's a shithole, that's all I've got in so many words.  Rebirth makes it too expansive, but then again I consider Rebirth to be like a 50 year+ head start on settlement to account for the town expansions.   Then again, Immersive Seyda Neen adds a breathe of fresh air that's sorely needed from an aesthetic standpoint, and for new players or anal mod junkies it's perfect.   As far as I go, I'm there for like an hour and then I almost never return. I can't even remember the last time I passed through with my latest character. Sometimes I'd try to make Foryn Gilnith's place mine, but I always moved the few local treasures to Balmora after half a day. It's pointless to stay there, it's a starting point and little more. Oh sure, you pop back in to get the quest to go get that nice little shield in the Firemoth plug-in, but what else? Maybe when you're 500k deep in gold you drop Hrisskar his pennies to close the quest, but that's it. You can't even give Fargoth the ring back.   Here's what you do in Seyda Neen: you save your game, you do 3 actual quests (Vodunius, Fargoth/Hrisskar, Processus), you use it as a launching base to raid 3 tombs and 2 caves, you sell what you can and then you vehk off to Balmora by way of Pelagiad or the Odai. You use it as a connecting stride sometimes, you go on to Firemoth in your level 20s, and that's it. Nothing else. The Bitter Coast is the Wyoming of Vvardenfell, high suicides and fuck-all to do after an hour. 
are you good??? cause I'm looking for a group and you can be the 3rd member
shut up Bloked
You give me hope. I'm 11(?) days out and I'm miserable (not with FH of course!). We are really hoping to get passed some family drama to make this event about is again. 
I'm not sure what's compatible. Some have 12 word seeds, some have 24 word seeds, and even if the number of words is the same they may not work.  It's a mess.
How about the cops that act jumpy? I was stopped for speeding on my motorbike. White male, 38 at the time. Clean cut, no tattoos. Stopped the bike, got off, took my helmet and gloves off and waited standing next to the bike. Cop pulls up, gets of his bike and walks up to me with his hand on his gun with the holster unclipped. I genuinely thought he was going to shoot me and I had no idea why. THAT made me jumpy.
If it can get that ugly with a police dog why are police dogs still allowed?  Doesn't this seem like excessive use of force?  A dog penetrating my skin with its teeth seems far worse than taking a few punches and we all know taking a few punches is still going overboard on the police officers part.
中国主席と最後の膝詰め談判へ＝「南シナ海」など協議－米大統領   http://www.jiji.com/jc/article?k=2016083000581   Ｇ２０「南シナ海関係ない」＝中国   http://www.jiji.com/jc/article?k=2016083000750   南シナ海「軍事的解決なし」＝米国務長官   http://www.jiji.com/jc/article?k=2016083100667   衝突なら「全員敗者」＝南シナ海問題で越主席   http://www.jiji.com/jc/article?k=2016083000829
Oh my god that is the cutest thing ever and such a thoughtful way to make her feel included in your soon to be family! I'd say marry this man but it sounds like you're already doing that! Congratulations and wishing you a lifetime of happiness :)
Very accurate ... I would add not being harassed all the time to the list.
Of course it's not an exact comparison, but I'd be interested to hear what makes one better than the other.
I forgot what cartoon was this, someone tell me?
Mate, how many times have you posted these exact words in the last hour? 
A fellow drive bender hoarder. I'm sitting around 14 tb in my pool. I think my next purchase are going to be a couple of drives to start a drivepool pool to migrate too. I've never had issues with drive bender but now that it's a retired project I'd rather migrate off before something bad happens
That Russia thing an enemy Zarya says right before my team gets buttfucked by all their ults.
Deus Ex will never get remastered regardless, the current team has specifically said they will never remaster it as they know they can't capture how good the game was so they want to respect it properly by leaving it alone.
I bet you he's going to double down saying that they never talked about who WAS going to pay for it... just who wasn't.
What signings?
3 panels, but still just as terrible. 
Doesn't take a lot of effort to search up old posts, just like it doesn't take a lot of effort to come up with something original.
Nina, a fairly.. disliked character, is intensely attracted to Euphemia, the girl in the picture. She uses our hero, Table-kun, to satisfy her growing sexual needs.
Yes if you installed A9LH you're safe. To check you turn off your 3DS then hold Start then press Power and it will boot you into Hourglass9 
The perks of your quarterback's parents being rich as fuck. 
why do people drink coffee or tea?
Had it for ~2 months, have not recieved a single survey :l  Edit: just realized it doesn't work for people under 18.
I was talking about the dude in the thread saying to refuse a breathalyzer, which WILL get your license suspended where I live.
You got lucky this inning Orioles, but Gallardo still got more hits and runs to give.
"No it isn't" isn't a double negative, although I should have included the comma after "no", really.  As for your question, Zola (naturally, given my username), Solzhenitsyn, Blake, and B S Johnson
Yeah loved Ace Combat way back, there were a few others as well, and on the PS3 I enjoyed the HAWX games and the revamped Ace Combat. I should probably get into those games again tbh
why would u want to get rid of 2k party mmr, you get to win like every game
http://imgur.com/tleFjr2
lol
How about we all try &amp; make tons of money together then we can slay all the girls we want, well the gold diggers anyway, money = girls.
I've actually been doing it like that from the beginning haha. I started on 150 days with a drawing of Mewtwo and Mew, then I did Dragonite, and just went down the list. I only started posting my drawings on Reddit when I got to Kangaskhan (is that how you spell it?) though, and I have missed a few days, so that's why you may not have seen all of them.
I am a beginner too. Yeah its his extended shadow onto the wall and roof. 
That's a wonderful idea!!! You made this before work?? That would take me forever... Pattern?? Thanks!! 😬
What can a pc do that a mac cant?  this.
Ya, I have 2 close friends who tolerate my insanity, and they are all I need. 
none of them read the manual
Thank you, /u/TheClash15! You have awarded karma to user /u/Wanted_Chaos.  --Moderators of /r/pumparum
I still have no idea what this says
Your post was automatically removed for being a mobile link. Please resubmit with a non-mobile version. You can typically do so by removing the '.m' portion from your URL.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/todayilearned) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Id be keen but im in australia and can only play weekends and nights. Been flirting with the a rank for a while now
It's job? The USA has a massive debt problem. It needs more money. That is what a carbon tax is for. It cannot cool the climate, or save the planet. The planet is fine. The climate will be what it is despite our puny efforts. It has already been repeatedly shown and admitted, that the effect on global temperatures of a carbon tax would be negligible. Even if the USA decided this morning to 100% completely stop using gasoline, and diesel, and stopped generating electricity with coal, from this moment on, and on into the foreseeable future, the only measurable effects would be the mass poverty and starvation. "Using assumptions based on the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) Assessment Reports, if the U.S. as a whole stopped emitting all carbon dioxide (CO2) emissions immediately, the ultimate impact on projected global temperature rise would be a reduction, or a "savings," of approximately 0.08°C by the year 2050 and 0.17°C by the year 2100—amounts that are, for all intents and purposes, negligible."  http://scienceandpublicpolicy.org/images/stories/papers/originals/state_by_state.pdf  
from the application of fire
Yes, under sauriks repo. Also what repo did you get iCleaner from?
but ya commented 2 hours ago.
Vector job scams
;)
Yessss, and their babies... I love guinea pigs and they're related so that's what got me. Did you know some people keep them as pets? I feel like that would be so badass haha.   Shrews are great. Do you have a dog?
I think Pandora was just an exception because she made *herself* look like a bitch. She was just really sour that she had to work with Mimi, and while that's kind of understandable given how low she placed on her season, she didn't really seem to roll with it at all, and since she was eliminated on episode 1 she had no chance to really redeem herself.  I think Tatianna is just more of a wild card. When she was talking about strategy, I think she was just keeping it real by saying that she doesn't think all the girls are going to eliminate people "fairly" as the season goes on even though they're saying that now. I don't think she was referring to herself specifically. In the preview of the next episode she revealed that she would've eliminated Coco too based on the challenge, and if she really wanted to be strategic from the get-go she probably would've gone for Adore.  I think she won't go out of her way to be mean, but I don't think she's afraid of looking somewhat bitchy if need be.
Desert Island Disk, no question. GUTG gets a little repetitive for me, it doesn't quite have the subtle beauty of DID. But it's still a wonderful song.
just search for fenrir grayback/hermione granger and you're good. [here's one example](http://archiveofourown.org/works/910102). explicit and very fucked up. read at your own risk.
You're welcome, slut. :)
Got old.
I would assume he has a massive ego, and he wants to capitalize the most off every song.
Never heard of that before.
[Image](http://imgs.xkcd.com/comics/exploits_of_a_mom.png)  [Mobile](https://m.xkcd.com/327/)  **Title:** Exploits of a Mom  **Title-text:** Her daughter is named Help I'm trapped in a driver's license factory\.  [Comic Explanation](https://www.explainxkcd.com/wiki/index.php/327#Explanation)  **Stats:** This comic has been referenced 1542 times, representing 1.2407% of referenced xkcds.  --- ^[xkcd.com](https://www.xkcd.com) ^| ^[xkcd sub](https://www.reddit.com/r/xkcd/) ^| ^[Problems/Bugs?](https://www.reddit.com/r/xkcd_transcriber/) ^| ^[Statistics](http://xkcdref.info/statistics/) ^| ^[Stop Replying](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=xkcd_transcriber&amp;subject=ignore%20me&amp;message=ignore%20me) ^| ^[Delete](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=xkcd_transcriber&amp;subject=delete&amp;message=delete%20t1_d74qn7c)
In game Id is khcdyid
Just speaking as an economist here, I'm not sure. Hear me out, we cut the farm subsidies, corn syrup gets more expensive. Problem is, people like cheap sweet stuff and demand doesn't just go away because corn gets pricy. So what if we end up developing an EVEN MORE FUCKED  alternative.   I'm not saying this is the case or even realistic, but I swear our addiction to sugar may be price inelastic.
The freaking Aztec xD
Once you do this, head over to /r/wallstreetbets for ace investing tips.
Something pretty similar happened to my boyfriend and I just a few weeks ago! :O It wasn't that long of a conversation, and my SO didn't try to hide it from me, but it was a pretty similar situation lol. Just tell Jason that you're not okay with it. You can elaborate on other situations (can't really think of any atm), but be *clear* one what is okay and what isn't when it comes to other girls.  All I literally had to do was tell my SO "I don't like this, and if you video chat with her one more time I'm breaking up with you." Then he knew that I was uncomfortable with it, apologized, and removed her from his Facebook. It's definitely not worth breaking up if he is sincere about making you feel insecure. Just give yourself some time to trust him again, like you said, and be happy once again with him. :)
PM please
That moment when you realize Kaladesh flavor is shaping up to be one huge Izzet &amp; Simic wonkfest.  http://i1.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/facebook/000/641/298/448.jpg
Yeah but HHH proved he's just a B+ player now.
Makes sense.. My buddy already purchased club seats earlier in the day. His company has 4 pairs of club seats in one of the middle sections row 6 or something. He didn't mention anything about a presale code though...
*DEEP INHALE* Hey Champ, get enough sleep last night?
It's true to some extent, but smoking will eventually get in the way of your happiness. If you need pot to make life more interesting, do not begin every activity with a toke, instead make a bigger change.  Was a stoner for ages so I'm with Bourdain on this one.
Dammit Rory.  Pick a name, any name!  Call out the champ, or the bottom of the pile, doesn't matter.  Start selling the fight now dude!
Cool, thanks. I need to experiment with it more for sure.
interested and upvoted!
Any tips for this matchup? It seems like it might not be so bad on anything other than FD.   This guy literally beat me 10x in a row before I got this win. (I partly blame the lag, but I probably just suck lol)
For the most part, yes.  They show competition images where they show the team, they show the final two sometimes on the thumbnail for the last ep, and then the live reunion show is also usually the whole cast in order of their place.
how can you know this already? that was seriously the only thing I was worried about as well
If Nigel is AD I will throw my television off my balcony. That could quite possibly be the worst reveal that could come up with. 
I loved Indicud. If we can get that kind of energy again, I'll be happy
He's not at a restaurant, he's at a rehab center with Brian.
Next stops Israel, Hillary, and Obama have not been friendly.  Trump could score massive points, if he met Kim Jong Un, and asked one question what would it take for Unification of Korea.
Cain fits into a lot of teams. He doesn't need many blocks to keep his stuns coming luckily. So ususally Cain/Healer/DPS works alright. Often see Cain/Mew or Cain/Woopa
The fake outrage over his liking the boobzone is sad.
I was talking about the Arab minority settling there not white flight. 
Was not expecting how great they look. 
l/d marisa sounds better but that active seems pretty accurate r/l reimu, g/b sanae, b/d sakuya and d/g youmu for all attributes? 
Werd
Mmmmk. Considering hurricanes don't occur (usually) in the Northeast, I think they can stay away for now.  Also, entirely unrelated: will the RP have a sort of "soft reset" to it every once in a while?
Your submission has been removed for the following reason(s):   * Rule 3 - No advocating or the act of cheating or spoofing ---  For more information, see [our detailed rules page](http://www.reddit.com/r/PokemonGo/wiki/rules) and [FAQ](https://www.reddit.com/r/PokemonGo/wiki/faq) on the wiki.  If you have any questions or concerns, please [message the moderators](https://www\.reddit\.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fpokemongo&amp;subject=about my removed submission&amp;message=I'm writing to you about the following submission: https://www.reddit.com/r/pokemongo/comments/50kblm/pokevision_pokevision_replacement_alternative/. %0D%0DMy issue is...).
People would have been banned for trying out new supports like morgana, annie and trundle. 
We still have robotussin!
No Man's Skyrim? 
I only made it about halfway through before I thought "who the fuck cares?" 
Join from the server browser. Only thing that's worked for me so far
Is it bind on pickup, or bind on equip?  If i won i would sell it. I've already got a ps4 and it's located so i can't even see it.
* original post: [link](/r/reddit.com/comments/k2bzs/tire_lion_chatsworth_sculpture_show/) * poster: [cartzo](/u/cartzo) * sub:  [/r/reddit.com](/r/reddit.com) * score: 1251 * comments: 107
No. We only play garage sludge grunge.
ice poseidon got pked there for tassets 2 months ago lol
1.5"  Lol
I don't have any stats on that either, it's just been my observations and experience.
The best facial scene I have seen in VR is easily NA's video of Julia Ann &amp; Kimber Lee in "I'm Banging Your Mom and Your Girlfriend". Has a great cumshot and close up kissing at the end. The end is probably the only really good part of the video, but its really good.
Serena needs to crack that thick skull of his
Up vote: Authenticity and Originality
Did I get skipped 
99% of my clothing is thrifted vintage gear so pardon my ignorance, but what makes this so pricy? I have a specific thrift store where ALL coats, jackets, etc are $5 and i regularly find similar looking coats. I know apc is legit but $700 seems crazy for a coat with such a common design 
Yeah, just saw the pack lists.  We'd better get Pendulum Domination REALLY soon.
IV % would help since I am too lazy to put them in by myself :D
'Someone shouted 'Cut'.'...  Superb....
You'll get the greatest poison damage from the storyteller's staff weapon art.
That was a really shallow draft though, and we did get Poe.
Yeah. I know. I do need them legit though.
This submission has been automatically removed because you did not include a question mark ("?") in your title. Reddit does not allow post titles to be edited, so if you would like, you can post the question again.  Please write your title in proper question format, and include a question mark, thank you.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
So we need to rise up, and kill them all?
I mean technically something like Spliner Twin can still be countered by Moat-Like effects or instant speed boardwipes
This is a very sad comment to see. If these very big issues were resolved we would have a much bigger and less toxic community  (This mean more funds for you ubi).  Another major reason I really want to see this game fixed is because i really want the game to succeed as an esport. It has the potential to be great! But it's true what they say, you get out what you put in.
No reason not to get a Wylde chambering, as they can handle 5.56 and .223 equally well.  Most shooters will never experience the accuracy loss potential of .223 out of a 5.56 chamber, but YMMV.  If you're building for that length, I'm figuring it's an AR pistol, an SBR, or you're Canadian.  As long as you observe local laws, you won't run into trouble. If it is a pistol, a heavy barrel is somewhat counterintuitive without a stock.  10.5 is about as short as you can go in 5.56 without a serious velocity drop, and I'm about to go with an 11.5 myself for that reason.  1:7 and 1:8 are both fine, but 1:7 will perform better with heavy bullets (above 65gr).
Are you fucking 13?
my kitties waking me up in the morning because they're hungry
A Nevada-tan brasileira é um pouco menos sutil que a original.
1. Lane filtering isn't about staying in cars blind spots, do you understand what you're talking about? Lane is about using your advantage for the benefit of yourself and the people around you, it's about getting out of the way. (If you say then get off the road, you're still not understanding that the road isn't just for you)  2. Your arguments boil down to you not being able to predict a motorcyclist, that makes you incompetent, I don't currently ride a motorcycle, but I'm always aware of my surroundings and keep my eyes out for motorcyclists, I let them pass to give them safe passage as I wish I was in their position. California has the best law for motorcycle safety and has been getting better about that, running ads and informing motorists that the road is shared by all motored vehicles.  3. You're second argument is that you will be inconvenienced if something happens, get your head out of your own ass, you'll never know how wonderful flowers smell like that. Because you'll be inconvenienced you want to ban all motorcyclists? Why don't you stop driving a car to make space for all the busses and trailers on the road? they're actually using the space they take up on the road hauling something more useful and productive to society. I bet you most of the time you are alone in your 5 passenger 3500 lbs caged car, causing more pollution and taking up more space on the road than 5 motorcyclists, why don't you carpool or take the bus yourself? all those arguments you make come back to you.  4. We have different classes of vehicles, this is where your argument falls to pieces, we have different codes of conduct for different vehicles, buses, cars, trailers, and motorcycles. You wouldn't expect to be restricted to the same laws as a trailer while you drive around town would you? You don't come to a complete stop at every train track, and look both ways for 10 seconds before proceeding do you? There are different classes of vehicles for this reason and why motorcyclist should be allowed to filter in congested traffic. You're the one not respecting the road and you need some rage management and to take some ducking drivers education.   Thank you for reading this far, I have to thank you for taking the time to read my messages in completion and responding, I know it takes time and effort but because if this next point I have to ask you to no longer message me since you threatened me. It wasn't in this thread, it was in a different thread where were discussing the same thing, you'll notice your arguing with the same person in 2 different threads.(which again is showing how observant you are, and proves that the reason you don't want lane filtering to be legal is because you are too lazy or something and choose not to observe the road)  5. You threatened me, I dare you to come follow me, I'll have video proof and written proof of your threat. I will have your license revoked for road rage you ignorant fuck. (First insult, after you've already insulted me and I took it calmly, but you don't threaten me one fucking bit without any repercussions) don't you dare threaten me. Stop messaging me if this is what you're coming to, you're arguments boil down to you being incompetent and not being able to share the road and being inconsiderate. 
PRAISE LIZARD JESUS!
Still my best friends and I'm still with my high school sweet heart.
[AA: You're still going to fight your Black King, right?   AA: But after that...   AA: ...There really isn't much going on in your session, is there?](/lm)
Dak was on the board when we took beavers.  
White girls all around the world will be doing this soon
I can't find the video again but it was the dalai lama connecting his thumb to his ring finger, then putting pressure on one nostril and inhaling through the other side then exhaling through the other. I did this every time I would hear ringing and eventually it went away. Now I don't really have it.
Ya, I was worried I'd never see her again.
I keep seeing DeepMind being used for a variety of things. I imagine each activity takes a large amount of time given the size of data involved. I was under the impression that DeepMind was just one very special computer, given a few tasks to test it and do more science. Are there in fact more than one DeepMind computer each being given a list of tasks, or are we only using one computer and constantly keeping it busy with the next mission?  Because with the slew of things I've seen lately I'm impressed with the speed it churns out results.
Your post has been automatically removed because you did not include one of the required title tags. You MUST include either [PS4], [Xbox], or [PC]/[Steam] in your post's title so your post won't be removed. You can also use the [Meta], [Question], [Discussion], and [Tournament] tags instead if they are needed. If you haven't already, remember to also include a region tag ([NA], [AU], [UK], [ASIA], or [EU]) in your title if you're looking to connect with other users.   Ex. "[Steam] [EU] Anyone want to party up in a few?"   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/RocketLeagueFriends) if you have any questions or concerns.*
This can be all sorts of things...maybe they mind you not being in Japan when spending money (if you're not in Japan that is), maybe their servers messed up, maybe your bank blocked oversea transfer...it's too general
No we wouldn't find out via reading ToS. It would be white hat guys who happen to delve into the coding for the program that finds suspicious activity. Just like how they found uTorrent was running BTC mining software on user computers without permission. 
https://www.roblox.com/games/1600503/Apocalypse-Rising?privateServerLinkCode=lm6qCsgXcXdi5U47fIoO6riW33siXLlW
https://ifunny.co/fun/GZmfaG1n2?gallery=tag&amp;query=mh17
Then again, the price might be the [coffee's for closers](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QMFwFgG9NE8) speech
Hes not looking so great. They eye is likely stuck shed. I can't think of the brand name ( and it's proberbly different in the US) but you can get some supplements that go in the water while you bathe him that will help shedding, rehydrating and stimulating appetite.  My worry would be infection under the skin. Infection neat the eye has a nice quick route to the brain. 
I have a gen 7 ipod nano btw
This is seriously videogame phyisics.
I personally think that there should be a daily "Anything Goes" post where content like that should go. Box pics, set builds, and hauls consisting of new retail purchases could join "what's this worth" in being relegated.  A daily catch-all would be more useful than weekly posts in two ways: dailies will stay fresh instead of quickly becoming graveyards, and people will be able to post their content whenever they want, instead of waiting up to 6 days for a fresh weekly thread.
I thought mine was the only one!  Almost every time I go in the bathroom he hops in the tub and starts fussing at me
I smoke like half a skimpy skin bin every hour or so to get me to stop worrying while I'm studying walked out of school with a/b/c/d's the d's were deslexia related though
damn. that burn tho. 
This looks strangely like Bernie Sanders.
https://www.reddit.com/r/LearnJapanese/comments/4vbhwc/  
I can understand that a change this big sends shockwaves, yea, but I'm with you that they seem to have very little understanding that tweaking uses time, and simply refused to wait it out or adapt.   The games are fundamentally different though, so I understand the hestitation, but they are kinda expecting Dota 2 levels of patching with their own super high standards of perfected playstyle.  Like, I'm a filthy ember picker, but I don't expect to win every game without adapting. If I went Bottle&gt;Boots&gt;Aquila&gt;BoTs&gt;Battlefury&gt;Crit every game I would lose a ton more. Same goes with CSGO and their patches, if they don't want to change, it's gonna suck.
Radiohead is a no brainer in the first one. Second one is a bit trickier... two artists who IMO have very spotty discographies, but their high points are 10/10 amazing. Going with Beach Boys here but would feel fine about either.
the easiest. 
Eating.
Every province and territory in Canada is slightly different, but in Saskatchewan, Canada, mine cost me precisely zero.
Disclaimer: I'm an art enthusiast, not an actual artist.  Looking through your deviant art account, I think this is definitely your best work. I really really like it. I couldn't resist the urge to fiddle with it a bit (I AM SO SORRY for destroying your work, [view](http://i.imgur.com/GOpC93I.png) at own risk). Please note: I don't intend to take your work apart, I'm normally doing this kind of stuff for myself. I usually don't like stylized paintings at all (as opposed to stylized drawings, which I love), but this one is just amazing.  To sum it up:  * Armpits too high? * Hair shading is fabulous holy shit * right arm shape weird (corrected inwards), but then the difference between left and right might need compensation * shading on that piece of clothing maybe too sparse * cranium too long? Couldn't really wrap my head around it (pun not intended) * freckles so good, eyes so good, nose so good, lips so good (I bet those lips took a while) * The missing shading around the eyes and nose may be an artstyle thing, but I don't think it's working (also missing/weird ambient occlusion around the hand) * Highlight on the right arm and left collarbone is fucking on point * I don't think the left eyebrow would be fully covered in that perspective, but I didn't really get it to work well either, so I don't know * I would have liked to have that smudge + highlight above the lips and that little line below the lips (added them) * Left breast too high maybe? Something's weird with the left arm anyway though so I'm not sure. * Hand shape and shading is wow, especially lighting coming from inwards * Eyesocket dent in head shape missing?
It's almost 12 years old fam
That's great. Mind posting your team? 
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fTlw3T44ynk
Oh ok that makes sense.
This may be unpopular ^^~~/s~~ but in my humble (henceforth to be serially disproven) opinion, *not dancing.* If you can nod your head to a beat and you don't enjoy dancing, the problem isn't the dancing, it's that you're judging yourself  Let yourself feel alive, let the beat touch your feat. Regardless of what anybody thinks or how it looks. There's no such thing as white men can't dance. And there's no "oh i agree except for me" either. There's just people who don't judge you for enjoying yourself and people who do. Don't be one of those people (who don't*)!  Dancing is one of the most human experiences you can have. Monkeys probably wonder what the stars are when they're throwing shit at the sky. But I'll bet they don't Hip Hop Rock Ya Don't Stop
Any Canucks season ticket holders here??
as with many college programs, the books and tuition as well cost a life-altering fortune.  The previous generation pushed us so hard to go to college so they could bleed us of all our money.
It ended before it started this year
But if you win the lottery, you could donate half of your winnings to a cause that saves lives, which would help much more than saving just one person.
I would love to play on that as an adult.  Actually an even bigger one with a few nets to deliberately fall into would be amazing! I would pay big time for that. 
There's a normal Loot-A-Rang that still works... but requires engineering. I can't imagine a main that doesn't have engineering - there's too much utility!
Green
It says only members can change names but I don't want to put membership on it if I can't change the name
I really like riki.  One thing to keep in mind with Riki is that he's a horrible laner if you buy a sentry, which you should, so the main way he progresses in the early game is with ganks.  As a support, your job should be to keep an eye on his rotations and do not let him gank or even really pressure your mid for free if you can help it.  As a carry, well obviously don't put yourself in situations where a riki gank is possible, which is not very strong in the early game at all.  He's a snowball hero, the easiest way to stop him is to not let him get started in the laning phase.  Once out of the laning phase, as other have said force staff, bkb, and sentries everywhere are key.  Another thing to keep in mind is his power spikes at certain times, around level 6, around diffusal, etc.  So be particularly aware during those times.   Once he's fed, you still have options, he's obviously not the hardest carry in the world, so even if he's got a gold lead he can still lose manfights because he's pretty fragile (stat gain wise).  So he is prone to disables/stuns/nukes, especially if his team is trying to push high ground.  Imo riki as a hero is all about punishing position (and by extension, vision) in every phase of the game, from early to late, so to the extent you can secure those for your team you can counter him.  Also, his kit is almost all physical damage, so things like ghost scepter and armor work, although probably not the best solutions.
Drum sticks
Well, I know enough to know a hectare is 10 000 m^2, not 1000 m^2, and that a liter is nearer 1 quart than 2.  I also know that 1 t/ha is 1 hg/m^2 and some of his garden allotments are pretty small.  I have not ground through all the numbers, but I think he will have trouble feeding 20 people, and his choice of crops pretty limited.  The communal garden is 1.4 ha divided into 8 sections of rotated crops, about 0.17 ha each.  He gets 1900 kg of potatoes, 5700 kg of cabbage and 3700 kg total of mixed carrots, onions, and leeks (That will help flavor all those potatoes), but only 892 kg of wheat and 425 kg of beans to feed 20 people for a year.  Pretty boring diet heavy on the potatoes and cabbage, truly a peasant diet.
Okay maybe I'll load it up tonight and check and see what's going on. Thanks guys for the update.
No!!!!  Never used it!!! 
RemindMe! 3 days
[Here.](http://www.larue.com/larue-tactical-mbt-2s-trigger)
I like tricams, too.  Nothing beats them for horizontal cracks, and as long as you use the right size (not too big) so that there is a bit of play, they are easy to clean.  I only really use them in camming mode though.  For passive mode, I prefer stoppers.  Pink tricams rock!
This is great!
How many have slept with OPs mom
You're still in the exploration stage, you're bound to test things a bit. Now you've tested it, and now you know, so you won't be craving that sandwich for years like you might be otherwise.  Anyway, story: I'm a few months in to no meat and severely reduced dairy and eggs. Well, my room mate made brownies. As soon as I bit into one, I could tell he made it with heavy cream. It was a very strong animal taste. By the time I was done eating it, the effect had faded and it tasted like a normal brownie to me. But I had another one the next day and the same thing happened. I'm not feeling those brownies anymore.
Please only proceed to throw cooled down, boiled, soft potatoes.
Damn, someone feed that girl!
Hey look, it's another one of those pointless and overexpensive sets!
Man, I knew it'd be Murphy.
Actually that would be great. I'll probably be on tomorrow, and I'll tell you my FC then. 
Got a team wipe with barrage in comp, had flown so far up by the time they realized I was there they were nearly dead.  I did this right after our Winston popped his Ult.   Distractions.
chanka's turret can't break the boards inbetween the walls, though.
Ill say this, I liked the tech test as well.   But in terms of, "Is this a Titanfall game?", at least in my opinion, it isnt.  Why buy this when I can have other games offer me different unique experiences like Halo or Siege? Titanfall 1 offered me something unique. But in my eyes, this one doesnt.    Still a fun game tho.
Lol bro. You screenshot it when it said "calculating"  lol.   Anyways. I mean people typically get 4 to 6 hours of use while the screen is on. With that usage, the standby time (until phone dies) is about 21 hours.   Here. Here's mine. I get 4. 5 hr sot with 22 standby.   http://imgur.com/a/OmwPN   Let your gsam calculate readings (takes a minute upon initial download)  and there you have it. If it's under 4,or under 3.5 hours sot, something is going on, and we can talk about that later. FYI- the Facebook app *is* a battery hog. There are 9ther Facebook apps that consume much less battery. I personally just use the web browser. But if your battery life is complete shit, the Facebook app wouldn't be the only culprit. 
I love how the main protagonist is Elizabeth and booker is a much colder simpler and more generic character. It seems like the player character is the protagonist in most games. 
I have a job in Lincoln but I don't believe they offer any gym plan (or at least didn't mention it at any point). I'll add Genesis to the list of gyms to check out.
[Another 360° of Rhian](https://gfycat.com/AlarmedSpectacularElephantseal)  More 360°: /r/NSFWBulletTime/
The movies after alien 2
I wanna know how Liz didn't seem to notice or care when Mr. Hands was all up in that girl's business. Liz's *boyfriend* said something to try to stop Mr. Hands, but not Liz.
I was scheduled for a late morning job interview at xyz company. I had a breakfast burrito and then went to grab some coffee. Got the pre-interview butterflies and felt a fart brewing. Surprisingly enough (not really) the nerves plus the coffee plus the beans was the perfect storm for a leak to spring...and spring it did.  Luckily there was still time and I went to the bathroom to toss the underpants. No further penetration so I was in the clear. Had to hold my farts up to the interview though for fear of a rerun.
By that logic the USA should be 4th in world and Sri Lanka 9th.  Btw, those stats aren't very updated i guess. Argentina has circa 150k registered players now. The 100k number is pre 2011 RWC
Well there's Akame ga kill getting your balls crushed then slashed in half
CNN just tweeted it. https://twitter.com/CNN/status/771134853387526145
get a better computer noob 
Calf stretch. Then I roll the foot on one of those beaded rollers or a frozen water bottle. 
Lifting in addition to burning extra calories can help you retain extra lean body mass which is good in other ways.
that is exactly what he himself said, not me. Michael Jordan (when he wanted he could shoot 3s forever, and he did when it mattered, in finals against the blazers when they said he couldn't shoot 3s).  and yes Curry dreams he was as good a shooter as MJ. if he was 1 third the shooter MJ was he'd have 2 rings by now.
LOL, that completely misses the point.
they deserve to get banned
The stronger the neg, the sweeter the booty!
So I got 5* Zabuzas. Is it better to fuse them together or keep them both.
Shocks are moving, but only certain ones, and not up to their previous prices. 
That's not the experiment from the OP though, the video you linked is from a similar experiment in Dublin.
I think it's more of he's seeing more pitches than some of the people on our team (Odor). Although I could be wrong.
you are 30?
German ones. They're the most flexible.
I like how in her second ascension she uses a jacket 90% similar to Gil's in UBW. Taking the Archer class as serious business!
It won't be that bad.  Keep in mind that you don't necessarily need to heal people at low health.  People that did the math found that healing people *after* they go unconscious is always more efficient than trying to make sure they never go unconscious in the first place.  This is why folks can get away with making characters that focus on other things than healing.
well thats sounds awesome
Amen, just moved down here a few weeks ago (finally living with other fans) thank God I don't have much spare cash cus it'd all go to my local po boy shop
Which is all fine and good when the challenge isn't simply hoping the servers don't crash.
"Hmm...what else earns your favor, then? *Super* flattery?" He asks with a chuckle. 
What typo puns are these?
For some reason I read this in Mel B's voice "annoyin allofa suddn"
Does vale tudo really mean vale tudo?
/s?
so much got cut... a lot of the best stuff in my opinion
Got to love the Heavyweight TUF, wish they could get another season.
San Fransisco already exists in the MCU tho. 
Squad! Gang gang !
You would think people entering would have the decency to upvote at least. But there are currently ~160 comments with only 82 upvotes. Thanks OP! Upvoted!
Says the anonymous internet poster, who definitely isn't a stingray...
Beg to differ. I don't want to say more because.... Spoilers 
On the link above, it looks like CSE and CE, CSE and EE, and CSE and CS aren't allowed, but it doesn't say anything about CE and EE. 
D
Underrated answer, this should be top 5.
I'm not exactly sure why you keep bringing Clinton up like I'm defending her, when I just told you two comments ago that I don't support her. Might be that you are just reading the same way you read everything else: superficially.  BTW, I'll blow your mind by telling you this, but I'll risk it: you know that famous image of Hillary Clinton and the KKK leader? Yeah, it's photoshopped. David Duke's support of Trump is very real though. Just deal with it.
So Buttsauce.. any calls?
When people ask you how you got home the next day and you say teleport you know it was a good night.
In other news, water is wet.
Hello /u/FLaTone85  Your post has been flagged as a repost and has been removed. In /r/giveaways, reposts are allowed once **48** hours pass.  **To prevent reposts in the future, use the [Giveaways Repost Finder Tool](http://checkrepost.com/)**.  Here is the original post: [Win an EVGA Nvidia 1060 {??} 9/12](https://www.reddit.com/r/giveaways/comments/50kbkc/win_an_evga_nvidia_1060_912/) by Aiwayume. This was posted **00m 00s** ago.   Please note that the bot may have made a mistake. If this is so, please [message the mods](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=/r/giveaways&amp;subject=/r/giveaways+Incorrect+Post+Removal&amp;message=https://www.reddit.com/r/giveaways/comments/50kbke/win_an_evga_geforce_gtx_1060_video_card_91316/%0A%0A&lt;&lt;Enter Reason Here&gt;&gt;)
I've had the opposite happen. I thought someone was waving to someone behind me, so I looked behind me to see who they were waving at and there was no one there.  Also very awkward. 
Jotting fancy words from Thesaurus doesn't make you cool.
&gt;&gt; The Abrahamic faiths, in particular, make scores of claims about history, geography, geology, physics, biology, chemistry, etc. In most if not all instances, the claims are inconsistent with what scientists and experimental data within those disciplines are telling us. &gt; &gt; Not under a plain reading of the Bible. Only fundies and atheists read the Bible that way, though.  This turns out to be simply false when we investigate.  To start with, almost 150 million Americans claim to read Genesis literally and believe the world is less than 10,000 years old. Dismissing what appears to be very close to the majority view as the domain of "fundies and atheists" seems like a cop-out.  Beyond that, so-called "sophisticated Christians" still tend to smuggle in unscientific thinking in scores of different ways. I mean, I'm guessing you aren't willing to assent to many, if any, of the following propositions:  * There is no afterlife. Death is final. * Your brain is not responding to inputs from an immaterial soul. * The Jews were not slaves in Egypt, and the Exodus is entirely fabricated. * Jesus was not born of a virgin. * The Second Coming and other events described in Revelation will not come to pass. * Prayer, itself, has no effect on anything that happens, ever. * God does not intervene in the events of the universe.  Denying any of these is unscientific, and we could easily come up with a much longer list. But without question, *most* Christians deny more than one of them. I have no idea where you, personally, come down on these issues so I make no judgments in that regard.  &gt; There's absolutely no reason for a Christian to think his religious beliefs must conflict with science.  It's certainly possible to identify as Christian without believing anything that conflicts with science. But people who fit this description are rather rare.
I reckon a lot of it is because of the medium- because everyone is physically detached/removed from everyone else, the best anyone can do is a general, non personal statement.  The internet isn't an ideal place to get help, so those who want to help tread carefully to try and gently steer others towards real-world help, on the chance that they might actually find a way out of the fucking gorge they're stuck in.
Thats some incredible useful information. I instantly went to look up my town on OSM. Pretty much nothing there is tagged green, maybe thats the reason we have no nests here...
ana is a girl name .Is he gay or something ? nothing wrong with that
Australian here. Can confirm its proper pronunciation is zed-wave.   Please ensure your funding includes the ability to teach Americans there are other countries in the world apart from Mexico and Canada.
I have a place in Logan Square if you are interested. Here is the link to the craigslist ad. http://chicago.craigslist.org/chc/roo/5760238478.html
They can have mine if they give me 250k, I am serious.
Now I've realised that all my childhood favourites are dying off, Dick Van dyke. That man has been part of my childhood for as long as Gene Wilder, Robin Williams and Alan Rickman. Chitty and Mary poppins were two of my favourite movies growing up and Diagnosis Murder was a staple in my house. I think I'll lose it when he goes. I saw his autobiography in the shop today and I'm definitely gonna buy and read it. 
i think it should. it could be that the reasoning is that a crossbow fires faster than it can scan? the fastest thing it has to go against is ashes breech and its so slow you can see it mid flight. 
I wonder if this is the only 'different' interior from the standard or if some others exists out there.
#**I have the power! They're just annoying!**
My mum has befriended all the local magpies and crows. Although when the crows started standing outside the front door crowing and tapping the door, she had to scare them away and stop feeding them. 
Hello! Thank you for your submission to /r/UnresolvedMysteries! Unfortunately, it has been removed for the following reason(s):  Unfortunately, due to concerns about witch hunting or involvement in ongoing cases, we don't accept mysteries that are less than a year old. However, feel free to resubmit if it's still a mystery after a year! If you feel this was done in error, or would like better clarification or need further assistance, please don't hesitate to [message the moderators.](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=/r/UnresolvedMysteries&amp;subject=Question regarding the removal of this submission by /u/bulio&amp;message=I have a question regarding the removal of [this submission](https://www.reddit.com/r/UnresolvedMysteries/comments/50kb6t/where_is_maxime_gagnon_a_canadian_gone_missing_in/\))
He evolved from Orlando Bloom to Jared Leto to his final form John Mayer
Trump just got slapped down in front of the entire world.   He looked defeated when he was on stage.
Ok lol, I didn't think you were serious but I couldn't be sure
ur saying that redline with the visible red stripes on the mag are worth that much? i got a 10.007 with red stripes on mag for 20 bucks not long ago. Seems a bit crazy that it would be worth that much
but solidworks is PC only which can make it harder for students to access if they have mac classrooms. this has happened to my students when i taught 3d printing/modeling.
Im fine with that. As long its a group of friends or you guys are ready to go. 
Life Aquatic. My first. 
Mostly because nobody wants to waste 1 hour on a single run.
They said the same about Buck Showalter and the Orioles in 2012 I believe.
Yezir. S6 edge 
Maybe it could be for the next kingdom hearts series. There is already a crazy amount of content for the current story.
I'm OK if its gone but if there is any chance I could get it back I kinda want to know how hard it'll be so I can decide. 
What did you use for yeast?  That makes a biggest difference in my opinion.
That's his Ninja Way.
To be fair "retard" and "faggot" have kind of just become insults within themselves, rather then referring to whatever they previously did. That's not to say people don't still use them in that way too, but it's not quite the same as calling someone a spic or nigger or whatever other racist word.
Damn wtf lol. I swear champs and FTL are all shady. Employees be holding for themselves and lying but I get it, first come first serve. 
Purely judging by the fact that there are several other hairs that seem to be infected as well, I would say an ingrown hair.
Why wouldn't it be a thing?
I have used them, albeit not a whole lot, and i enjoy them. If the bolt is locked open i don't know why you need to thunder punch the mag into the gun, but i haven't had that happen to me yet. I have seen that happen first hand with Hexmags though, and it is a pain. Ill try and see if i can get it to happen next time i take them out(most likely tomorrow)
added!
Hmm, I just installed the DLC through PS Store, but I can't find the option for Japanese voices in-game. I know it's supposed to be somewhere around when you select difficulty.
Tone doesn't have a chain gun. It has a 40-mm. Legion has the chain gun (actually, mini gun).
This is an all too common scenario these days.. I really just don't understand why anyone would want to do these heroic dosages.. It's like playing russian roulette..  On another note I commend you for helping that guy that asked you for help.  Most people would not want to get involved.. Kudos to you bother!
Sometimes you get cancer, sometimes cancer gets you.
I told myself I wasn't gonna masturbate today
I do wish people would do a better job of respecting the game titles. I hate it when someone requests "core only" and then someone joins, throws down NEH fast advance, and then flattens them. Why? What are you gaining from that? You're probably going to score an easy win over someone who is just learning the game and possibly turn them off from playing it.  Personally, I would have no problem asking anyone who joined the game if they were going to play core set only directly in chat, and then conceding the game the moment they use non-core set cards. If you're just trying to learn, you shouldn't have to get dragged through games against finely tuned decks just to play one that is actually what you asked for.
Mind you, it's been over twenty years, but as I remember it the stink factor going from solid food to meat was at least as bad as the jump from breast to solid.  Wow, I'm doing poop algebra. 
So with the patch notes out do you still this LA with voltaxic is still viable?  if not that I guess I'll do another BV build as it seems that will be strong.
Well that would be a democracy.  We live in a republic.  It's why electoral votes aren't representative of population, it's why each state only gets two senators, and It's also why we have article V which allows for a convention of states.  Anyways - I'm not hear for a discussion  on gov't structure.  I'm only working to use the one we already have.  Thanks for your input!
Try say hi then leave him alone.
It's neck to neck right now oh my god
The Leduc to Edmonton bus stops at century park. The last one leaves at 5:55 PM. The Leduc commuter pass is $80/month or you can buy packs of 10 tickets for $45. So the pass makes sense as long as you're taking the bus 18 or more times per month. Then you will unfortunately need another fare inside Edmonton.   A monthly pass is $91.50 or packs of 10 tickets are $24.75. So the most economical route is to buy a couple of ticket packs unless you are going to be working 35+ days a month, which I believe to be impossible.  Google maps will tell you the best/quickest routes to the Century Park Transit station. It's going to cost you roughly $6.75/day for transit, which sucks, but still less than driving!  Also, if you're receiving AISH benefits ETS offers transit passes at a reduced rate.  For driving, I would have your SO take you to an empty parking lot a few times a week to get comfortable. Stopping, starting, putting the vehicle into park, that sort of thing. Cruise around, pull into parking spots, just get comfortable with where things are in the car. If your SO is patient, start driving around Leduc at night with him giving you tips. I found drivers training was good for polishing up your skills, but you need so much more seat time to be a good driver than what is reasonably offered in drivers training.
You have to realize, these people are fundamentally evil. They're no different from Trump supporters, they just wear different outfits. They are extremely, intensely tribal people, and they want to hurt people who aren't members of their tribe.
Forge is different from mods in that they rarely deal with end-users, only other developers. On top of that, the person on top of that is *LexManos*, whose reactions to those less...knowledgable are legendary and make anything I do look like nothing.
If true the regime seems to be hoping to form a defensive line using the two hills nearby to stop further movements to Hama.
PM'd
Yeah I would agree with you that Ikon isnt managed that well.  YG promotes Bobby and BI mainly I watched M&amp;M and WIN but seriously sometimes I forget that they have other members besides Bobby, BI and Jinhwan. 
There is another brigade that goes after stories that make Israel look good.
What would happen if I actually tried 999 combos?  I assume fraud detection would pick up on it and freeze the account...
I've disenchanted at least three golden Millhouses in my Hearthstone days.
it's not, all that is hacked client features.  cant photoshop full screen 
We could... *Or*, we could force him to watch as we light his entire family on fire.  EDIT: No, wait, no.  They might not be assholes like him, we'll leave them alone.  [We'll light  ***HIM*** on fire.](https://youtu.be/e3knR0rQ934?t=139)
How many mock drafts have you done, and what pick do you normally get? Is it a low number of mock drafts and around the same draft position?
Done thanks for the tip.
I want a car. Chick's dig the car.
I wanted to scroll down before I made a Bigfoot joke. I made the right decision.
M or L
If i never trusted my gut I'd have an illegitimate child, no money in the bank, terrible friendships, a degree from ITT tech, and a career at a job where they asked me to commit fraud.  My gut knows the game is going to die if they keep only artificial movement, and I trust it very much so because it's fucking brilliant with regard to it's track history.  I'll demo the game, but till the dev comes out and says "we're going to at least try shit with teleport" I'm not going to be cupping your balls.
[I gotchu fam](https://www.etsy.com/search?q=polyamory&amp;order=most_relevant&amp;view_type=gallery&amp;ship_to=US)
A+ with 307 average.  Short sentence disclaimer.
PM?
How in the hell. I wouldn't question it for a second if you said you were in your late twenties. If you have a skin care secret, please share. 
Why is it that the Libertarian Party seems obligated to take the full-on no-holds-barred libertarian position on so many issues? What's wrong with a more nuanced, centrist approach that is libertarian-leaning? It feels like Maslow's hammer in many ways.
Oh sorry I just realized I linked to the wrong model, turns out I bought the last one for the NA so it's not on their page anymore. Edited 
Look mate. Most people here do not necessarily have their waifus react to things. It is a characteristic of the tulpa community.   If you are essentially imagining Freyja with you all the time and is sentient and can react to situations like this there is a high chance what you are doing is essentially building a tulpa. That doesn't change the fact that Freyja, the ideal, exists in your head and that you are in love with her.   Do not take what I say offensively. Just don't.
And how many times will rizz say he doesn't know who's he's voting for. 
Fast Ball. Its so tiny, all it does is increase the range of baseball grenades and make them explode on contact but it's one of my favourite mods. Makes playing explosive characters more fun, makes BBgrenandes worth making and has a tiny footprint.   I'd love a thousand of these little improvement mods
I watched the entire thing. I'm not sure how I feel about it. 
Orlando. Excellent coach and probably the best PF you could possibly play alongside a guy like Vucevic.
There's never been a game where I didn't think snipers were bullshit. I asked the same question before, and the answer was summed up to "because some people enjoy the class." The sniper is so ingrained into fps that by not having one is a determent for it's appeal.   Personally, the lack of one would is *far* more appealing, but I just gotta deal with it I suppose. Past few weeks with Widowmaker being in the gutter have been amazing.
Not his destruction itself, but the compilation of photos of his destruction. I just think it's strangely beautiful in its despair and brutality. 
To other users posting on this thread (and **not** to the submitter of this particular thread): offering on price check and question threads is not allowed. Failure to abide by this rule may result in a temporary or permanent ban.  Sharking is not tolerated here, and any attempt made *will* result in a permanent ban.  [Please refer to our subreddit's rules as well if you have any doubts.](http://www.reddit.com/r/globaloffensivetrade/wiki/rules)   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/GlobalOffensiveTrade) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I notice the bottom left corner has an oil stain.   Could be mediterranean chicken.
The goddamn library full of awesome Stan &amp; Jan Berenstain books before the weak-ass bears took over their whole career. Seriously funny but risque and even insightful family life topics. *How to Teach Your Children About Sex Without Making a Complete Fool of Yourself* was a favorite.
Thank you.  I'm trying to be patient.  I know it's a process.  It just bothers me that she's in pain..
They basically did, considering the fact that Germany annexed Austria, Czechoslovakia, and other parts of the northern A-H empire, Hungary, Romania, Croatia, and Bulgaria were German allies, and Italy owned the A-H part in northern Italy. Therefore I would assume that their contribution would have lead to a more or less similar result. 
If my tub had come any sooner than it did I don't think I would have made it.  But it showed up on like day 26, so I forced myself to tough it out.
Yeah, I was surprised that the person who posted this wasn't the girl. OP didn't get the hint and fucking explained the pun, then was so proud with himself has posted it here. Clueless.
:\^)
W
I keep getting matchmaking failed
That's the closest thing I can think of, unless you want to throw magic into consideration. Cipher is further developed than DD at that point, i think it's believable that they could have Fulton tech
&gt; . Though drinking your nutrition might take a week to get used to for psychological reasons.  It took me several weeks for my gut to get used to 1.2 and I never fully got fully used to it. 1.5 made things a lot better. I've not really had problems with bloating on 1.6 or 2.0. But just pointing out that it can take some time for gut flora to re-adjust to any new diet. A vegetarian who decides to start eating meat is going to require some time for the populations of related bacteria to increase to where eating a steak doesn't cause intestinal discomfort; the same is true for switching to any brand of soylent, though Rosa labs has been doing a good job tweaking the recipe so it does well for most people.
They changed the laws a couple years ago and that is all they are legally allowed to give you, the FICO and some generalites.  I don't think you are legally allowed to ask for more.  I have two tenants now with very low scores, around that.  They are damn good tenants to be honest.  Decent family with well raised kids.  It's not so much money that they couldn't pay back CC loan.  I don't understand it.  I'm crossing my fingers.
Added!
I want a car. Chick's dig the car.
That's such crap.  When I was on the waiting list and finally got half seasons a few seasons back I got a presale code.  Why only club members?
Floors 1-10
1kg of gold would be a sphere that's 1.82 inches (4.63cm) in diameter. I'd imagine it would be more comfortable to use a 2kg rod with rounded ends, that would be 5.46 inches (13.86cm) in total length and 1.82 inches (4.63cm) in diameter, which is just a little bit larger than the average penis size of 5.1x1.5 inches (12.95x3.81cm) and worth $168,760 as of close of business today. Accounting for your 100 free gold phalluses, you'd have a total value of a little over $8.5 million.
Trump is a fantastic brander. Guy is incredible.
223 2111
Yes the difference however is Alkan is already close with Jmods as he is Maxed multiple accounts, one being with 5.4B xp. Alkan also reported A maxed account with like 2b XP or something that was botting to a Jmod, people pointed out the bot was still around with just a name change and wasn't banned.
My hair is the main topic of debate, people that are close to me say its best back but I like it down plus I get relentlessly mocked at my rugby club and called Gareth Bale because of it.
I don't watch anime I'm just not a fucking asshole
Nah, if you showed me a picture of him outside of hockey I would guess he was big in to canoeing or rock climbing or some shit. 
I definitely don't hate Wukong and for sure would like an update to his kit, as most likely will happen in the next class update. Would you mind showing your win rate with the champion if you advocate so much for its quality?
Is the bruising only appearing on your legs? Do you have results alongside your lab's accepted range?
seems like it
&gt;offend or shock  Maybe people that get offended over bad words shouldn't be using YouTube?   Honestly this sounds like a way for Google to censor videos they dont like, although I hope I'm wrong.  Either way, it's fucking retarded
* Username: dweller_12 * Join date: 2013-12-09 20:49:41 * Link karma: 3015 * Comment karma: 6643 * Confirmed trades: 179 * Heatware: None  ^^This ^^information ^^does ^^not ^^guarantee ^^a ^^successful ^^swap. ^^It ^^is ^^being ^^provided ^^to ^^help ^^potential ^^trade ^^partners ^^have ^^more ^^immediate ^^background ^^information ^^about ^^with ^^whom ^^they ^^are ^^swapping. ^^Please ^^be ^^sure ^^to ^^familiarize ^^yourself ^^with ^^the ^^[RULES](https://www.reddit.com/r/hardwareswap/wiki/rules/rules) ^^and ^^other ^^guides ^^on ^^the ^^[WIKI](https://www.reddit.com/r/hardwareswap/wiki/index)
Well I don't shoot anymore.. but absolutely I would never consider not using a filter of some sort.  Sure you'll waste a little, but the trade off is worth it.  I actually used to save my filters for the inevitable day that I would run out of junk, I'd soak all of my old filters and then bang that.. I'd get one last good shot, but 50℅ of the time I'd get cotton fever *shudder*  Yeah I'm glad I don't shoot anymore.
[](/ajrdhoofbump)Buck yeah.
damn you hello kitty damn you
Actually, it's a very small percentage of people that hate cops, namely criminals.  You drink the kool aid the media pours.  A higher percentage don't like traffic enforcement.  But if you want people to drive Russia, go live there. 
Elder Scrolls VI please, they've spent over a decade building up the elder scrolls universe and there's still a lot of unanswered lore and questions id rather see them continue before jumping into a brand new IP.
/swoon
OTTWWTPTB
I have wondered when age discrimination actually applies to a situation. Thank you so much for clearing this up
I definitely remember Lin saying somewhere that he would be in London for Mary Poppins
I'm with you there after 8 years in my town house I'm going to a single family. Too many weird noises (I have neighbor units that touch me on two sides), too many little kids hanging out in the back yards curiously looking in my windows, too many rude neighbors parking in the drive-portion of the cul-de-sac instead of the actual, you know, painted parking spaces (of which there are many).   Curiously, never a single problem or issue with the HOA, which is what you normally hear people complain about. I just want my own darn yard and no touching neighbors so that I hear every time they use their microwave or slide a chair across their floor or play exploding snap or whatever.
Gracias Senor Presidente
sploosh
Seeing this is inspiring even tho I can't sidemount and can barely bind  Fml
**EDIT, GIVEAWAY IS NOW CLOSED, I AM ONLY GOING TO GIVE PEOPLE'S POKEMON BELOW THIS MESSAGE, ANYTHING ABOVE WILL NOT COUNT, THANK YOU ALL FOR PARTICIPATING IN THIS GIVEAWAY XD, I WILL DO THIS AGAIN SOON :D**
John Cena would like a word. 
but thats what he meant...
Thanks for the suggestion!  I'll look into it.
Damn, Kojima is ripped.
Black and Icex3!
Looks like learning how to speed solve the 3x3 is going to have to wait. The Boy broke his wrist in PE this afternoon and its been immobilized for 6 weeks. Yay!  I guess he now has lots of time to watch the How To videos. 
"Guys... you don't have to call me the Pizza *Boy* any longer!"
"In the eyes of the law and under California’s murder laws, it is possible to have multiple causes responsible for another person’s death as long as that person’s actions amount to a 'substantial factor.'  In this case, the prosecution could argue that the father is at least in part responsible for causing his daughter’s death because he threatened a police officer with a gun. The father’s actions allegedly set off a chain of events that ultimately was a 'substantial factor' in causing his daughter’s death. [It does not matter that the father didn’t pull the trigger himself."](https://www.wklaw.com/can-convicted-murder-didnt-actually).
Life is long, you have heard all the input and you feel the way you do. Just let it go. Plenty of time to make more mistakes.
Epipen has generic competitors.  They are either 1. Less effective or 2. Not marketer appropriately. Number two is the reason why companies spend so much money on marketing and sales. So your conclusion is partially erroneous.   Not to diss doctors - but they are kind of stupid when it comes to drugs a lot of time. They can't be expected to always know everything. Which is why they are educated ... Ad nauseum. 
No, he will stay in prison with us.
Whoa.   Honest self-awareness usually gets downvotes on reddit.
Hahaha loved that video when it came out man! weird to see you chillen on here
Why not just two 1440p?  1440p is about the max the 1070 can handle on high settings solid 60fps. And you can get a good 1400p for dirt cheap.  Also unless you have a 30+" 4K monitor you will need scaling, and having one scaled and one non scaled monitor leads to things looking terrible.
Would rather have customizable stats
*Strongly Agree.  I think I'd have the biggest smile ever if at least 1 Adam K &amp; Soha song was in it.
The line between "progressive" and "regressive" is pretty blurry right now. Punk rock, we need you. Come back. 
Because they had dickheads at management (Rich). Susan came along and things seem to be going better for them. Their players have personalities now. I'm not a fan of them but from my perspective they seem a lot more filled with energy and personality.
Are you in a dorm? Or a student in a lab or something? If a dorm, talk to the RA about package delivery. They probably know how it works in your building. If you're in a lab, talk to the main front desk person at the college of yours advising. Ask them where your building shipping and receiving is. I know where engineering has theirs and that's all. 
I hate to say it, but ur_a_idiet is right. BLM has made some stupid moves, but nothing they've done qualifies as domestic terrorism 
Hey Surgery buddy! Mine is scheduled the 20th of September too! This is a relatively mild surgery, and in the past my recovery time has been a week, but yea we have a friend coming over to stay with the children who we trust  and my husband is going to be with me. I wanted him last time, but she kind of shouldered her way in and since he knew she would be there, he said yes to a work trip. I've only recently grown a backbone, but this guilt thing is really bugging me.
Roger that. Keep at it man, you really inspire a lot of guys with your approach to life. 
A drone made to look like a robot could explain alot of the video, but could you make a drone appear to walk without it looking like a puppet?
I can actually imagine Paul Rudd saying something along these lines. Fits perfectly into the humour style of Peyton Reed and Adam McKay. 
And yet he still gets paid 6 buck an hour "at best" and has to clean up turds in the urinal. Poor guy. 
I think Makita and Dewalt make the best cold cut saws, I personally use a Makita currently. I own the Dewalt but it wont run off of DC, so I only use it in shop. I didn't know they made a cold cut saw that could cut compound miters, I've always just used a bandsaw.
Deodorant, showing up to class early, chewing ice( bad for your teeth but cools you the fuck down) and get this wearing an undershirt. I'll wear one and bike to school and I won't feel that hot but it absorbs all the sweat so it doesn't show through my shirt 
Those overwatch cheaters promised they do it. My wife seems to be playing fine right now though.
he clearly doesnt anymore Cx
Take a lot of drugs (works with me)
Hillary is ACTUALLY dumping boatloads of money into Arizona, Georgia, and Utah. All three are states she will lose.
&gt; but who defends a person's right to clean air? Who defends an ecosystem?  I don't care about ecosystems, I care about the people who rely on them. A person's right to clean air is defended by the government, unless he explicitly waives it.  &gt;Common-law (where poeple have the right to sue abusers) doesn't work in these instances because of the high legal barriers/cost/time of prosecuting a case. A case which the firm with the most money is most likely to win. Further, firms can make the right campaign contributions to ensure they are given "rights" to pollute etc., (as they do all the time), making it even more difficult to overcome externalities through common law. This is pretty well established by institutional/behavioral economists such as Ronald Coase.  Yeah, that's why I'm not categorically against things like environmental regulations, but I think the way they're done in practice right now do a pretty large amount of harm along with their good, and not as much good as they could.
Wait, the game gave me the impression that Geralt changes horses frequently and just calls them all Roach?
Chargers 2015.  We don't get spooked into reaching for Melvin Gordon at 15.   Instead, the Niners take Armstead at 15, the Texans make good on moving on from Foster at 16 by taking Gordon, and take the BPA at 17 - Marcus Peters.  Take Perryman in the 2nd, but in the 3rd round, instead of wasting a pick on Craig Mager, the Chargers take David Johnson (instead of letting the Cardinals make one of the best moves in the draft).  Alternatively, there's a version where the Chargers would take Henry Anderson at that spot (and presuming the Chargers still wind up with the 3rd worst record in football, and that's still likely even in this scenario, it leads to drafting Ezekiel Elliott at #3 overall in this most recent draft).  The rest doesn't really matter.
Use a P bass. 
yeah love the tone of this track. got a real slick, cool feeling to it.
Yes, it was a true shame when Tech Review published that.
He's [now working as a Lyft driver.](https://youtu.be/SJwrUaQvtsc)
I like where this is going :D
Explain how any of these make it better for gaming. 
&gt; for international (mainly Europe)  Depends where you live and what airports are convenient. The domestic carriers are approximately the same in terms of what they offer. Delta has free beer, wine, and liquor. United only has free beer, AA has free wine and liquor.   Where do you want to go? Obviously your options for direct are way different flying out of NYC than from somewhere like DEN. And if you're chasing down F/J, it might not matter since I'd gladly pay cash to get to a gateway to fly on certain products
She looks like doctor wrecker!
Sorry, lives being saved by accidents being avoided by computer drivers that humans cant avoid trumps your enjoyment of driving.  It amazes me how selfish some people are.
We're swimming in W's now thank god
And when they're left with a garden centre 80% full with three days to closing time they will be reducing greatly, I guess it's like supermarkets they either reduce the old stuff or just chuck it out - can I see Masters with dumpsters full of plants, maybe. 
[A SON?  HE HAS A GODDAMN FAMILY?]  [Alright, I'm gonna ask it. What is a Mothra? What does it have to do with Godzilla?]]
RTZ should have been #1 yet he is not even on list. http://i.imgur.com/QCQTJH8.gif
Ok the giveaway is over now. Please leave your Pokemon in the GTS. I will doing a clean up right now. There were a ton of people tonight. So please be patient. There is stills 1 more day of this set of Pokemon. Thanks to those who participated. PEACE!!!
Disclaimer: going on a mix of moderate knowledge of this project and general understanding of aviation, could be talking out my ass:  This wasn't for a modern battlefield. Not only was it the late '60s, it was proposed for COIN (which is a highly-budgeted and dumb scenario no matter what year we're talking about).  On the avionics, I'm not so sure in this case...I can't expect they were putting much in the way of high-tech in there. Frankly I don't know. They *were* going for COIN, which is generally significantly cheaper/simpler/maintainability-er (due to export interests) than all-out CAS.  On the maintenance, exactly...having an existing airframe with largely-, readily-available parts would be a huge plus. Mustangs were everywhere in the states and Europe (?) even this long after the war.
Yeah, I trust every stranger too, solely because they gave me no reason not too!
If this post prevents just 1 "hey guys I just graduated and didn't do any internshps or anything  and have been looking for a job for a year pls helpppp" then it'll be worth it. 
Getting very drunk and doing all the fun drugs I had put off.  Also telling the people important to me that I love them.
Chapter 14x of /FE6! Apath and Sven continue to hard carry me, but joining them is Masters! Berserkers are now a mere hurdle thanks to Apath's crazy avoid combined with his Masters+Asuka triangle support.
Not really a big deal to me. With the exception of my music appreciation course.... For obvious reasons.... I try to not miss any days if possible. 
It will be funny watching Trump push his cuck ass around
"Hey"  "I read the thread. F off."
Floors 11-20 + Mirror Stage 1
yeah it's been happening since Engineers dropped.
Ah that does make sense, I'll try it out on my next leg day. Thanks!
It's so meta even this acronym  so  meta  even  this   acronym 
How is that a lot? I took Adderall for many years - 30mg XR. He's only taking 10 more mg.  But what you said towards the end is true. If you can't sleep and can't eat, you're taking too much.
Lots of the comments here are about clothing and confidence. I'm sure this is very true for most people, but what helped me the most was getting involved in sport (basketball and volleyball) where being tall was an advantage. I was surrounded by beautiful, athletic men and women many of whom were my height and taller. It completely changed my perspective! 
What a crazy situation! Call the cops next time, she was basically trying to break into your house. 
/r/loadingicon  Edit: it's even already there :p
Oh no. i didn't expect anything like that to happen, wow... I honestly can't imagine Emilia acting insane. D: ty for the info.
Your post has been removed because your account is less than 3 days old. Please lurk moar before posting. If this offends you in the slightest bit, go fuck yourself. If you aren't a thin skinned cuckboy and have actual good content to submit, please message the moderators and we will review the content and make a decision to approve or remove said content and approve you as an approved submitter if the content is relevant for this subreddit.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/sjwhate) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Try running CCleaner on it and deleting your call logs and old text conversations. 
You have limited options.  Basically, generate more income (more jobs) and stop all non-essential spending.
CCP are good at this sort of thing. PLEX is a clever system and this seems pretty well thought-out too. I'm sure I'll go back for at least a look in November.
Looking forward to the Tesla response here. Everyone can forgive errors, glitches, and delays. Hiding the removal of safety features is inexcusable. 
I think it's on the X chromosome, but recessive, so women (who have two X chromosomes) will usually have their colourblind gene on one X chromosome cancelled out by the dominant non-colourblind gene on their other X chromosome. If a male gets a colorblind gene on his X chromosome he will be colourblind because his other chromosome is a Y chromosome.   I'm stating this quite roughly because it's been a while since I did high school biology. I think that's usually how sex-linked genetic disorders work - they're recessive and on the X chromosome, so women who don't have the disorder can carry the gene and pass on the disorder to 50% of their male offspring, but men who get the X chromosome with the bad gene on it invariably get the disorder.  Someone who remembers the science better than me can feel free to correct me on any details.
oh shii waddu.....no riot, damn it I am not doing this. 
... You're a bit of an asshole.
Gotcha. Seems a bit much though, at that price renting for 5 weeks and some change would have payed for the entire thing. Oh well glad you enjoyed it!
You get data match discount if you are on simple choice family plan for 2 lines with unlimited data.  https://i.imgur.com/jV98ljG.png  $140 for 2 unlimited lines. 
Is this a news headline, or an automatic e-mail response?  Will she return my correspondence on Monday?
why not just wear a fucking skirt!
Yeah, they bought a bunch of chinese/holosun crap and rebranded it with a +$100 markup cause of the name. 
Well drink and drink and drink and drink, and then we'll drink some more. We'll dance and sing and fight until the early morning light, then we'll throw up, pass out, wake up and then go drinking once again
Definitely, he needs to tell the employer about his OPT status as the employer would need to sign the OPT papers so USCIS can issue Employment Authorization. Edit: Don't take my word for this though..I'm not an attorney :)
Bahaha "the yucky-looking part"
Lol. Well are we talking anonymity or open range 1980s networks? We know we can't go back to the 80s, at least until some new layer of tech comes along to really change things. Anon is an illusion, between what we openly share on FB to how wireless signals are trackes and data storage is done...it's only a matter of time. To suggest otherwise would be another tap on the snooze for the problem.
Yeah I know the 6700k is slightly faster in gaming as it has a lot faster clock speeds. Why I have the 6800k in my server/wifes gaming rig. 
Not like she is pushed for mod slots if you ask me being able to close the distance take out aerial enemies and flit between enemies like its archwing is worth a slot to me
I volunteer as tribute to eat the practice briskets. 
That hand eye judge is sexy
If it is your last day, you don't have to worry about metrics.  - Try your best to help people who need it, You're free to take a little extra time and effort.  - Rush the jerks off the phone. QA and surveys can't hurt you anymore.
I don't think she has reflux because there's no issues at night when she sleeps on her back. Just the day time.
&gt; cymbalta is an anti-depressant too. SNRI, same class as wellbutrin.  Sorry, I think you are incorrect on this:  &gt; Bupropion is unique and unlike other antidepressants in that its major effect is on dopamine, an effect that is not shared by the selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors or SSRIs (for example, paroxetine [Paxil], fluoxetine [Prozac], sertraline [Zoloft]) or the tricyclic antidepressants or TCAs (for example ...  Buproprion is good if you have fatigue, it definitely makes you feel more energetic.
All of those ^. Also, just so rude. Oh ya, and racist
probably around 8000
Literally unplayable ^/s
Goodbye
Cue the "Reddit is being used by marketers!" theories.
**Flight Unit ON**  **Movement**  3 Down  **Action**  W3 on Viper 3  **Enemy Phase**  Retaliation with W1 &gt; W2 &gt; W4 &gt; W3 priority unless:  Accuracy with preferred weapon is 60% or lower and within range of W3 - Prioritize W3  Below 3.5k HP - Defend  If out of range and/or not enough Will - Defend
What's really depressing is that the only thing in the photo that could still be seen today is the sunbeam. Everything else was either melted down and recycled into something else, buried, or disintegrated to dust.  Yet to this girl, everything in the photo was just as real and permanent as the computer I'm typing this on and the room I'm sitting in.   Edit: yes I'm aware some things could have been saved in museums or by individuals today.
Why? Some people have big families, or just prefer to stock up once a month on payday instead of weekly. 
Went so well for you in that other thread yesterday lol
Aww poor baby has to look respectable in public? Dawww it must be so warm...  Honestly, if you can't look past your own cultural bias you aren't worth talking to.
"Because my intelligence and hardworking nature needs some derp to balance it out" (jokingly) 
This content brought to you from "Taiwan Pool"  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#off site feed "Taiwan Pool")
Hey that's fine, maybe I don't completely understand how the generator works. Maybe it wasn't fully implemented, who knows. You prolly don't either. But I'm glad I didn't waste any more of my time especially since school started.
Hello, /u/Bromiszr, it looks like you're new here! Your suggestion was removed because you haven't gathered much karma yet. You need to have more [interaction](https://www.reddit.com/wiki/commenting#wiki_commenting) with the /r/MinecraftSuggestions community before posting suggestions yourself. Please gather some karma by posting contributory comments before trying again. ---  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/minecraftsuggestions) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Oh man those are amazing 
&gt; I think my issue is that I sort of visualize what I want to write, but then I'm never satisfied when I put it into words.  I'm going to take a wild guess here.  You visualize something, then you write it down. Then you read it and it's not right, so you tweak it.  Sound familiar?  Can't write like that. Well you can, but you can't find the Truth of something like that without agonizing over every sentence for ages. Can't be a productive writer like that. Nobody does.  Next time you want to try to describe an image you have in your mind's eye, try describing it repeatedly. Don't worry about wordiness, this is your draft, man. Drafts are just long notes to yourself for revision.  So say it simply, then keep adding details to it, keep circling back at it from a different angle, try different similes and metaphors. Eventually (and it shouldn't take long) your brain will wind its way in the direction that feels closest, and \*bam\* out of the blue you'll find something that sings the Truth of that idea. Then keep moving! In revision you'll come back and distill that pile of thoughts into one killer evocation of your idea.  (I'm assuming this is an *important* detail that you're trying to get right. If it's not that important, leave your top-of-the-head description in there and MOVE ON. Remember, by the time you finish your first draft and come back to revise, you may find the entire scene needs to be cut, so you'd be a damn fool to spend much time on any sentence in drafting.)
Lol no.
Same.
I agree but there are people who seem to be almost perfect. I asked this question because of one particular girl and to me she is perfect human being. She is all the things I consider perfect.
Thanks a lot, I appreciate it. 
The Undefeated has become a massive parody of itself that very few Black Pro Athletes want anything to do with at this point. 
*wooooosh*
Now the real question. Is it worth 200 bucks?
Luckily for us, switching the sides of the image is impossible for [magical computer reasons!](http://i.imgur.com/LlDN0mS.png) xD
You think that is low? If that is extrapolated out nationally using the pop vote from 2012 that is 28,000,000 people that will think the election was a sham if Hillary wins
I'm wondering what kind of hell would be that shared mind.
There's a lot of nostalgia glasses being worn in this thread. If you've never played the original Elite, then sure, try it out for half an hour. I wouldn't bother investing more time than that though. The only lore associated with the original came in the manual and accompanying novella, 'The Dark Wheel'. If you want to see ED's real roots then I'd recommend trying Frontier and its sequel, First Encounters. Those games even had an orrery system map which would be super helpful in ED.
With the exception of passing offense and special teams, we are between mediocre and garbage.  I think Kirk is capable of 6000 yards and 50 TDs **this year**, but I don't think we can get through four rounds of playoffs on that alone.
I'd be sad to lose him too, but out of the three you named, he's probably got the highest trade value at the moment.
Why not go the homeowners insurance route?
How does a theoretical pacifist society remove those who will not follow the rules? If they ignore the person he will continue to go against the rules. If a person tries to defend their agreed to rights against that person, they will have to use violence. I think it's incredibly unlikely that a human society can exist without the implied force of violence. What is a right if it can't be enforced? If you as a society have agreed that you have right to a piece of land, but there's a group of people there that try to kill you when you use it, do you actually have a right to it? Now maybe you'll argue that rights are derived from the human experience. No one should impede your rights that would require violence to enforce. Life, liberty and the pursuit of happiness (property). But when you enforce these rights, particularly in the case of property, you end up restricting the others. Enforcing property for instance, can lead to an infringement of the right of life (starvation) and liberty (freedom to travel, freedom of speech(intellectual property)).
Haha indeed
That is ridiculously awesome, and I say this even as a blue player.
Sad, but true. 
Excellent mental gymnastics you have there. 
Hey Ouz, unfortunately your submission has been removed because it was a link to a video hosting site (probably YouTube itself). If you're trying to share a video, you should stop by /r/videos instead.  /r/youtube is for discussing YouTube as a whole: its features, bugs, design, trends, and so on.  If you think your video fits that, please [send us a message](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fyoutube&amp;subject=Please+approve+my+video.&amp;message=%5bLink+to+my+post%5d%28https://www.reddit.com/r/youtube/comments/50kc93/youtube_might_be_shutting_down_philip_defrancos/%29) so that we can take a look!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/youtube) if you have any questions or concerns.*
You got one because it spent the money you earned.  I think they patched this.
The sound that happens when your health drops to low. It's annoying and I can't turn it off.  I know I'm damaged, game, I don't need to hear my heavy breathing and blurred vision. 
I hate you both. You'd think after a year of public transport for 3 hours a day I would have built up a decent immune system. 
I think he peaked with his X-force run, everything after that has been going downhill for me.
Why not just search PayPal using buyer's last name? That's usually what I do.
"Thanks."  Hannah takes it. "I'm not normally like this, but I've fought a goddess more recently than I've eaten, so I appreciate it."
People aren't stupid but really desperate. Most of the people I encountered would be a 120+ in bank loot risk with 1-2 noob (lvl 90-100) friends. Those kind of teams would never be able to get their own worlds so they came to PVP thinking no one would be there to kill them. 
I love your style! It reminds me of Loish, like others have said.
So, trump flew all the way to Mexico to get caught in *another* lie?  [Trump On Mexico Meeting: Payment Of The Wall Was Not Discussed](http://dailycaller.com/2016/08/31/trump-on-mexico-meeting-payment-of-the-wall-was-not-discussed-video/)  And yet now we learn it was, and it wasn't the discussion his rabid fans wanted. meanwhile in /r/the_donald they are cheering and not mentioning it.
Why would I want to even associate with DanTDM? He is literal trash, like you.
I wish there was some way I could get my starter back. Around level 15 or so I let him go saying, "This just isn't that kind of game. There's no point to emotional attachments to Pokemon here."  Now I feel awful. 
What's wrong with everyone having every card? At that point, all players get to enjoy the full depth MTG offers and compete without being restricted by budget or fighting with friends over what is and isn't an acceptable way to improve your deck.
Nigga tryna get some benzo as I type this! 
Floors 21-30 + Mirror Stage 2
&gt;[**Drake and Josh Anime OP [1:30]**](http://youtu.be/fTlw3T44ynk)  &gt;&gt;Inspired by Scorpigator's Corey in the House opening. Fuck that, Drake and Josh is clearly the best anime around.   &gt; [*^Suedeash*](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCxQN7MHbJh7sfVFU6zZ_olg) ^in ^Entertainment  &gt;*^204,582 ^views ^since ^Feb ^2016*  [^bot ^info](http://www.reddit.com/r/youtubefactsbot/wiki/index)
Another thing that should be fixed is the fact that the AK47 does MORE dmg than AR15. That's just ridiculous, fully automatic weapons should give LESS dmg than semi automatic weapons. If you get shot 3 times by an AK47, you will be 10HP SEVERE bleeding, so, if you try to kill the player who shot you, you will die bleeding, but if you stop shooting him and use bandage and medkits, this player can and will rush you easily.
Google taking over the world.
a girl should xpost that first picture to r/solesandholes!
Anyone know the scoop on this? Did Haskell play any positive/negative role in this? Will Haskell continue to play a role in the future?
I didn't really think it would be a common one! I'm from Ireland and didn't really think many people outside of Katowice would know it or have a reason to go to it.  I was never in Wroclaw, I mainly spent my time in the south. Places like Zakopane and Szczyrk were pretty cool, did a bit of snowboarding up there. Spent a couple of days in Warsaw but most of my time was spent either in Katowice or Krakow.   Nice country, really enjoyed it.
&gt;  because Arsenal were interested  lol
So far, bolasie, Williams, gueye, and steks look like nice signings, so I am hoping the mob is wrong about Valencia
Done boss.
only dropped maps would be t15 so it would depend on which tier you got the t15 drop from no?  edit: opened this post and replied without refreshing the other guy answered already.
No worries. I'm empty inside already.   Edit: And pretty happy with it. 
Over/Under 1000 people actually in the crowd   (and before I'm asked, not counting players or media)
I've been trying to do this in my nieghbourhood but blue team sucks here, it keeps getting taken down before they put their mons in, feelsbad.jpg
I like VI, rebel captive, fcs on echo. 
Thinking of buying SotFS on a pre-paid right now, are you guys still looking? I'd be deeply interested, as I've beaten Vanilla and none of the DLC. So, I hear great things that the SotFS has added into an already great game; all the more hyped to playthrough with three others.
Margate had some unique circumstances though. for one, the barge and tug were private, the NASA tank was merely cargo. Thus, the salvage claim was against the tug with the NASA tank counted as cargo value. If the tanker had found the NASA fuel tank adrift by itself, the case would have been different. NASA ended up on the hook because of their contract with the tug company and because the tug was out there in the first place at their behest rather than sheltering from the storm. You can't file a pure salvage claim on a government vessel which is why the Odyssey marine guys lost.
well fuck..i already am....
Man....best 2000 hours of my life. (With Movie Battles II mod)
Great points, all. Thanks very much. In sum, with 25K I could:  1. Start selling cash secured puts on a security I want to own and sell calls against. Keep selling until I have to own it.  Cost-basis reduced.  2. Sell covered calls, w/ various strategies as appropriate and as the market dictates (collar, rolling, etc).   3. Use income generated to make trend and spec plays via spreads (ie, using house money and ongoing lowering of basis).  4. Rinse/repeat, learning as I go.  In consideration, might also be smart to do this with 2 or 3 stocks, diversifying sectors. Appreciate everyone's input. 
Haha too true - saving it for the next room which might have a large vehicle in a confined space without explanation?
I'm in!
This link points to an ebook that is no longer free (current price: $9.99), and consequently has been marked as expired.  I am a bot. If I have made a mistake, please message the moderators.
If it's something you're worried about having, the sooner the better. It's not as bad as it used to be to have.  If it's not something you're worried about having, it's not hard to get a test for it, most counties have free testing.
Hero stacking is fine for a laugh and nothing else. Its not fun to force the opposite team to play the counter to your team and [I feel the same way.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Overwatch/comments/50944m/leaver_penalty_in_quick_play_wtf/) 
yeah, even things from over 15 years ago still make me cringe when i think about it; my brain will not let me forget. i end up having to shout it out of my head when it comes up.
for example, the new Freelancer HUD in the gamescom demo. That was beautiful.
Impressive! I think my first vegan meal was a plain toasted bagel 😂 
I got two!  I got a 3IV (HP Attack Def) Timid Mew.  It is yours :)
You could also eat ahead of time and consider the dinner meals just a time of socializing. Is it fair to not be able to eat with them? No, but if it will save you stress, then it is worth it. Tell the waiter you already ate and if the family tries to give you a hard time, then in a non-accusatory tone simply say something like, "I heard that you were unhappy with my eating habits so it is better if I eat separately to save us all discomfort. &lt;pause and change is subject&gt; Did you hear on the news that..."   If the family is at all decent, this should be a way to graciously expose them, and show them that your eating habits are not for the purpose of gathering attention, which is probably what they are thinking.
Could it be that after 13 years your choice of race during character creation actually affects something?
You don't need a doctor, you just need to be over 21.
Reading your comment feels like sitting in monks diner across from George Constanza
So like Beware of Dog signs right next to Snitches Get Stitches? 
Thank you. And youre right. Ugly crying. The kind of weird laughing happy hiccup crying.
Not to nitpick, but Audible hands out a sponsorship to anyone who asks. Even you could get one and post it at the end of every comment you post on Reddit.  They don't increase their advertising budget towards content-producers who generate more customers - they just cut the advertisers in on the revenue of the people who go to that custom audible url.
I guess I'm just so used to the death animation/kill cam in Battlefield 4. 
You mean believing in superstitions or believing in etymology?
I'm staying just to piss you off  #PUSSY
My nephew is like this with Minecraft, and at first it was kind of terrifying.  Then I remember when I was aged 7-11... and I think I spent a lot of time playing computer games too.  I think the advice elsewhere is really useful - yes, set defined limits (and keep to them!) but also recognise this is an opportunity to engage with her! I can see Minecraft as useful tool to teach a lot of skills, and is in itself a craft in the same way beading is (YAWN!).   What aspects of Minecraft is she interested in? I would start thinking about the kinds of things she does in Minecraft and find other activities aligned to those. She likes the hunting? Take her to archery range! She likes building? Build something with her (and dress up as Steve!) She likes exploring? Go exploring with her! She likes watching minecraft videos? Help her make her own? Maybe you tried all this...?
Pyroblast is the reason I main Medivh.
Is this real? Source?
Just take one in front of her some time.  I take lactaid (or generic equivalent) before meals with dairy. When I do that I take a little pill out of a contact lens container that I keep in my pocket and eat it right at the dinner table, no matter the company. There's no reason to be ashamed. When somebody asks me "What's that?" I tell them, and if they ask why I do it, I simply explain that, if I didn't, I would spend my evening locked in the bathroom, alone, drenched in cold sweat while a fiery inferno rages inside me and tries to violently punch its way out.   Nobody bats an eye after I tell them that because, who would wish that upon anybody?  A prescribed anti-depressant is different than a digestive aide, sure, but if a pill helps you keep your shit together and you're taking it at the recommendation of an expert or two (and yourself), then the people who like you will respect you for making the decision that helps you stay you the person they enjoy.
Juan Carlos
Thanks :D
This content brought to you from "Spain Pool"  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#off site feed "Spain Pool")
&gt;I don't understand how this is creating vulnerabilities  When poorly implemented, it can result in any cert being trusted, even invalid ones.
Remember when you deleted your twitch that one time? You were free then too!
Man why hadn't I ever though of this? Seems like a great idea.  
True! It feels a bit too outlandish though, and the circumstances of its usage are not exactly "official Imperial business". Aphra seems more of an S&amp;V character to me.  Let me give you a counter-proposal: Given the ARC's inclusion in the game, how about adding Maul's ship, the [Scimitar](http://starwars.wikia.com/wiki/Scimitar) We know from the Lando comics that Palpatine still has it and uses it for special missions, and I would argue the ship is more in line with the visual tone of Imperial offerings to date.  Game mechanics-wise it could be quite cool too. The ship was equipped with a cloaking device, so the Scimitar title could grant the cloak action. Large ship with a cloak would be dope, though obviously there would need to be things in place keeping it from being OP.
need more techis
Even if your Mother was a wonderful person and spread happiness and joy throughout your life I would still say please don't become her carer. Looking after someone who needs round the clock care can bring a person to their knees and that's with someone who isn't as vile as your Mother is.  It will also effect your children and not in a good way as your time will mostly be taken up by your Mothers care demands. Find a good care home.
No, that be Hillary that goes Hulk
What is this super secret pizza party I've heard of? And how can I join?   For real though, what's the 411 with FOOD? 
Me :)
Plot twist, EA purposely shut it down and faked it to save money on the cost of running the servers.
And you practiced as hard and as efficiently as these 120 people, and for all the years that they had, and you also took all the "juice" that they took and you reached the conclusion that you cant. Ok bud
NJ next please?
How old is the tank? I'd put my money on bacterial bloom, likely fueled by overfeeding. 
You guys realize you're arguing with a troll account right?
i rather gouge my eyes out then play totem
haha yeah, listen to my word. the fuckin dick is in your pussy.
I was reading the guy's review and I found myself unable to relate at all, until halfway through I remembered once being given a ride in a client's Rolls Royce Wraith. I've had 5 different cars over the years and tried probably 3 dozen or so. I currently have a high end sedan and a SUV but nothing can really relate to or prepare you for suddenly being in a car that costs more than the average house. I just remember being totally blown away by the experience, even though there's always this little voice in the back of you head repeating "It's just a fucking car after all."
i offered on ebay some for 25 others for 30 i got 5 for 115 total
Any stories?  I tend to stear clear of Western expats so I'm not really exposed to this side of things.
Acuna hit a HR in the 1st. 3rd of the year (37 G)  Riley already has 2 walks in the first 2 innings. Trying to extend a 14 game hit streak. 
Yea, like two months after launch. lol
What did you use to make this? Can you tell me how you were able to remove the character and show the background so perfectly?  It's AMAZING. How did you speed up one person but not the other?
Meanwhile, earth is like naive children in the dark forest dancing and singing around the bonfire, completely unaware of the dangers around them :/
Settings -&gt; Bluetooth -&gt; Play phone audio on watch
Savannah, GA just got a minor league baseball team called the Savannah Bananas. [It's pretty much the coolest thing ever. ](https://www.google.com/search?q=savannah+bananas&amp;client=ms-android-google&amp;prmd=sniv&amp;source=lnms&amp;tbm=isch&amp;sa=X&amp;ved=0ahUKEwiAnN6c7uzOAhVB1R4KHTuXDd4Q_AUICSgD&amp;biw=412&amp;bih=604)
I'm not entirely sure, seems like most of the reviews are pretty negative, but I will consider them.
Beautiful, and I love the color!
[I got you](http://m.mlb.com/video/topic/0/v12892895/must-c-clinch-feliz-gets-arod-to-win-the-pennant)
We do not direct treatment of patients we haven't seen for a multitude of legal and ethical issues. Call your vet to discuss pain meds, and don't give any human pain meds without their direction, as you can easily cause toxicities. 
Johnny Knockout is going to milk the milkman ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°) 
Floors 31-40 + Mirror Stage 3
There was no auctioneer in Dalaran during Wrath. Just use the portals.
I'd say if it is NOT your best in slot weapon, then it is NOT worth using the epic transfer stone.  You can only get the transfer stone through events and there has only been one stone ever so far.
OOC: Keep it bg. There is no real point, all it would be is Josephine being embarrassed as she shows Shika all of her body and the scars and everything.   ---  Josephine's trusty old wheelchair did not give up at the hill or anything. It only ever gave up once it ran out of battery power. 
Nah I'm good on them since I'm not that big of a fan and they're gonna go too quick so not worth it
Did... did you even look at the photo?
Fox once spoke to the US Congress and demanded Americans do more to help Mexicans in America illegally.  This, from a government that treats their own people horribly.  Don't these people realize that their opposition is just making Trump more popular? 
I have the Goon RDA by 528 customs and I love it. 24mm or 22mm. They look super nice and lots of room to build. As for mechs I have a tugboat v2 single 18650 and I like it a lot but I feel like I could've gotten something better for the price I've paid. I really want to try out the legendary or the shorty by sub ohm innovations. Mechs are all about your battery, if you don't have good batteries then it won't perform as well, especially on mech mods
I've only been to Boma once.  This is spot on accurate.  Sanaa is also amazing if you're an adventurous eater.  The food isn't that crazy in terms of flavors, just a lot different than what I'm used to.  As someone else said, the bread service is amazing.
Post taken down by Disney?!? BAHAAHAHAHAHAHAHAH. A for effort.
to put it bluntly, the show's over.  you're toast.  seriously, toast.  life isn't a romcom and you're not going to make some grand gesture and "win" her back.  accept that and move on with your life.  maybe you learned something, maybe not.  
We don't need to focus on being loud, don't blame trumpets for your bad band.
Not when you are trying to just get your half price drink and GTFO
Yeah, it was extremely unexpected. I was at a baseball game since monday was my only day off now with my new schedule. Boss knew I was there, so he wanted to wait 'til the game was over so I could still enjoy it. Still very last minute /:
Well tbh I'm sure the only people who disagree with you are elitists lol
I don't get why people are trying to make logic on things like this (and that is saying alot since were talking anime here). As far as what Oda said on an interview - it's a matter of design choice. Clothes stays the same unless alteration is needed to show context of the event outside their DF shenanigans. No awakening/ clothes taking part of DF whatsoever. Another reason is that it is easier for the animators to be consistent on what each characters are wearing. This discussion has been brought up hundred of times already and even when Oda himself explained it - people seem to ignore and they stick to whatever fantasy they can come up with to satisfy their lore.
Tesla's going to be making 2170 cells with 50% more volume and thus 50% more capacity than 18650's. It sounds to me that's what you want to build it for, if you want the best battery that fits.  Note: you really should let the main pipe just be used for the battery, cap &amp; switch while building the head separately to mount on the end of the pipe. Otherwise you just won't get the cooling and space you need for the driver &amp; LED, and you wouldn't get good optics. 
Cici is looking great!  I hope this confidence carries over against Angie (as long as she can keep it together for one more game)
Don't forget Jordan McCrae
I found out there is a sub for that /r/Phodography
I'm actually blind my seeing eye dog does my posting 
Another one?! Didn't he already get a picture of himself eating a taco?
WHAT!!!
Vlad Namestnikov looks like he just had his fifteenth birthday. 
Yeah you can stream tight ends later or find a solid backup a la Clive Walford off the wire. Stick with Reed- he carried me all season last year! 
I would add my voice to this recommendation as well. The iKon X3 is the slant I mention in my first post, and it's the only razor that I can do XTG and ATG on my neck without irritation, however, that is after a lot of practice and honing my technique on my first razor, and finding the right blade.
SHUT UP I'M IN LOVE
How is she taking away your opportunity? This honestly baffles me.
"Going out of business sale" What a concept! That is a good laugh.
I love every one of these days it can reliably land it on the fly. The dV you had to change it on the display?
FYI i'm a he and the package in the screenshot is from Macciti not my repo;)
I learned that gen after buying the old Gear VR only 3 weeks before my Note 7... now I gotta eBay it but not until this stupid detail ends!
One game doesn't mean much. The dude has a 7.14 ERA since the trade.
&gt;18-24 year olds were the only age group to oppose a ban; all others were in favour, with the oldest 65+ group backing the prohibition by a startling 78 per cent to 12.   *sigh*  What bad has this pattern ever done to us, huh?
yeah the quests are *fun*, but it's still a crazy slow zone.  Instead of hitting 10 in 30-40 mintues it can take up to two hours.
Weak meme
You need help, you can't do this by yourself. See a doctor and a therapist. 
yeah just always wait next to that wall at drake pit so you can hop over, its especially good when you spawn blue side.   Its most safe when you sneak in the pit as they have scuttle becauseit gives a false sense of security. "oh we have scuttle, no need to ward drake" always sweep that shit before you go in though 
Yep! Watch a little Netflix while I make the trip lol
They sort of fucked up the ESPN app too. Not entirely unusable, but definitely took a step in the wrong direction. 
The storm provides! I would love these leftovers &lt;3
uh I redeposited a male bagon level 39 for a darumaka?
Thank you for this response! I can handle sleeping better when it is outside forces if that makes sense? I understand new born mothers don't sleep often. I will be able to get some sleep. However, I can't get away from a pregnant belly. 
Thank you!
Wouldn't cutting hours be the definition of playing by the rules?  ACA created certain incentives for employers which they are following.
God damn, Selena!
:)
PA = NSDAP confirmed
Is there any benefit for attending there as compared to doing ROTC at another school?
You clearly don't have to interact with many burners.  It's like white kids when they get high, all they do is talk about other times they got high.  Sure the act might have been fun as fuck to them, but it's a god damn bore for anyone not involved to listen to, especially when it's the same basic story over and over again.
Moes: You need to give me your car. I'm the valet.   Toby: No my cars a bit tricky, don't.   Moes: You have to give me your car.   *moes Forces Toby out of his car*  Moes: Have fun at the thing. 
I can't tell if you're advocating suicide or elective medically-induced comas. 
I like it too.  And other traditional pro sets.  Chip Kelly?  Not so much.  Like I said: try KC.  I think that you'll find value there.
yeah me too, can somoene upload this to soundcloud
the shot goes where genji is aiming, not automatically back to its source
same here buddy
Verrett is who I would say is most likely. He's played like a top 5 CB already and if he can play a full 16 and the Chargers not being behind every game so the opposing offense has to pass I could see him ending with 6+ interceptions this year. 
K
Floors 41-50 + Mirror Stage 4
Lol! That's a good idea. Ensign! To the forge!
This content brought to you from "Spain Pool"  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#off site feed "Spain Pool")
Once went to BWW and ate 48 boneless wings
I called mine Little Buddy.
nice meme
I've heard of steel/aluminum mag releases damaging Glock mags by chewing up the plastic. Apparently if they get chewed up enough you will no longer be able to seat the magazine fully. Just something to look out for. Those Hyve extensions look sweet though.
Hey mate we aren't all Dragons supporters
i'd have to get transportation find contacts and then pay for transportation and then said contact. I cant just run down to walgreens.
Please clap. 
U might want to add Flipside Tactics. MeTTpuM was released from team according to valve roster site. This might be too late but who knows?
Sam Raimi suggested the title.. .so ask him!
That's exactly my point. Papy and Kone are your players, Denayer will back them up. So what's the point in the loan? He didn't want to be back up for us, but he does for Sunderland? I just don't understand the thought process. Rumour had it that he'd be our 4th choice, and with Kompany in the mix that gives him a fair whack at a few games. Just look at the minutes Kolarov as got at CB.   I get it from a Sunderland perspective, great signing for you. He's a top, top talent. But for City and Denayer, I'm not seeing the benefits. Who would he learn more under, Moyes or Pep? As others have said, I just don't see him at City long-term anymore. Which is a shame because his year in the EDS and his year at Celtic I had really high hopes. Last year seemed like a massive waste to me, partly his fault for choosing Gala, partly misfortune as Demi and Mangala wouldn't leave and make room for him as intended. Just feel like this year is going to be equally disappointing for him.
Also, Fossil fuel prices plummeted, so it no longer made any sense to build nuclear.
i just throw money at them on GOG buying older games, and they sill feel the need to give me free shit, i discovered not to long ago that i own all the classic fallout games on there, with no idea how i got them.
looks great how are you coding this btw would really like to know, since it looks great 
Videos in this thread:  [Watch Playlist &amp;#9654;](http://subtletv.com/_r50jhlj?feature=playlist&amp;nline=1)   VIDEO|COMMENT  -|- (1) [Peter Fox - Alles neu (offizielles Video)](https://youtube.com/watch?v=qdtLCfEcPL4) (2) [Peter Fox - Schwarz zu Blau (offizielles Video)](https://youtube.com/watch?v=yphwzD1XaBY) (3) [FARD - REICH UND SCHÖN - INVICTUS (OFFICIAL VIDEOCLIP)](https://youtube.com/watch?v=sgSKkPPV690)|[4](https://reddit.com/r/German/comments/50jhlj/_/d74m4td?context=10#d74m4td) - The problem with rap and a lot of modern music is that there is a LOT of slang and creative language (just like in English). That's my word of caution for using rap to learn the language better. In saying that, Peter Fox would be a good start.  Peter... (1) [Alligatoah - Amnesie (Official Video)](https://youtube.com/watch?v=4Q0KjucgvPk) (2) [ALLIGATOAH - WILLST DU (OFFICIAL HD VERSION AGGRO.TV)](https://youtube.com/watch?v=opoDBF_b-fg)|[2](https://reddit.com/r/German/comments/50jhlj/_/d74ns4m?context=10#d74ns4m) - I like Alligatoah's pronunciation very much, I don't know if they're rap or pop songs, but you can give it a try if you want to!AmnesieWillst du  [Samy Deluxe - Poesie Album (Official Music Video) [HQ]](https://youtube.com/watch?v=4bU4_cE4RTk)|[2](https://reddit.com/r/German/comments/50jhlj/_/d74n745?context=10#d74n745) - Samy Deluxe - Poesiealbum ist fantastisch!  [Fettes Brot - Jein (Official)](https://youtube.com/watch?v=tcV7VN3l3bY)|[2](https://reddit.com/r/German/comments/50jhlj/_/d74m4sv?context=10#d74m4sv) - 20 years old but still as great as ever: Fettes Brot - Jein (Lyrics)  (1) [Käptn Peng feat Shaban - Sein Name sei Peng, Albumversion](https://youtube.com/watch?v=Crl7GBEfQXk) (2) [Alligatoah - Musik ist keine Lösung (Official Audio)](https://youtube.com/watch?v=tMbSAxcTbUc)|[1](https://reddit.com/r/German/comments/50jhlj/_/d758eja?context=10#d758eja) - Shaban &amp; Käptn Peng have quite long raps with really well spoken, rather complex German.  As for Alligatoah I would suggest you look at Musik Ist Keine Lösung. has the best rap parts imo.   Otherwise I can point towards Trailerpark and ... (1) [SSIO - Nullkommaneun (prod. von Reaf)](https://youtube.com/watch?v=Slei8n08Cqk) (2) [Edgar Wasser - Einer von Ihnen](https://youtube.com/watch?v=FuG9YVL1DpY) (3) [Prezident - Es heisst, dass sie heiss ist.](https://youtube.com/watch?v=WljAX_oI87U)|[1](https://reddit.com/r/German/comments/50jhlj/_/d7589ya?context=10#d7589ya) - SSIO has a very clear pronunciation:  (starts around 2:35)  Also, Edgar Wasser:   And Prezident (but that has a lot of complex idioms): I'm a bot working hard to help Redditors find related videos to watch. *** [Play All](http://subtletv.com/_r50jhlj?feature=playlist&amp;ftrlnk=1) | [Info](https://np.reddit.com/r/SubtleTV/wiki/mentioned_videos) | Get it on [Chrome](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/mentioned-videos-for-redd/fiimkmdalmgffhibfdjnhljpnigcmohf) / [Firefox](https://addons.mozilla.org/en-US/firefox/addon/mentioned-videos-for-reddit)
After driving both the 4.7 and 5.7  I reccomend the 5.7. You won't be sorry. 
&gt; Its probably 1/20th of that.   That'd still be 5000$. 
If he beats HHH with the Pedigree, it kind of guarantees that it will be his finisher forever.
/r/sporetraders
If you are using Dawkin's scale, sure I guess. You should clarify that though since most people use agnostic atheist.
That does make you racist by definition. If you were trapped in an inclosed space one time, and are now afraid of all closed spaces no matter how safe, you are claustrophobic. Doesn't mean you didn't have reasons for it, it just means you need to get over your fear.
By the way, lack of pirates is causing global warming.   But honestly, stop comparing the two.  For one, litter laws have been around far longer than text/driving laws.  You could slap a 10k fine for it right of the bat (REALLY Alaska?), but it'd be better if they were equal or NOT COMPARED AT ALL.
Did you ask permission? 
I love you too. My fellow popaphilic 
Omg **hole I'm trash
Source Post: [reddit.com/50jxqi](https://reddit.com/50jxqi)
Not sure if I'm gonna be a huge help, but my sizing for CDBs was off too, maybe half less than usual (and I usually size down one for boots and dress shoes).  Fit is weird. Big tie just about scrapes the front, but the heel isn't too tight either. It's kind of a sloppy fit that you have to get used to and wear thicker socks. 
Michael Christmas - is this art? Its pretty good chill rap
"Dammit, Meth Chef! You're supposed to cook risotto for the mayor, not meth!"  "Looks like someone didn't get the METH-age!"  ROB SCHNEIDER IS....
What settings are you using? I don't get anywhere near that with a similar setup. Like 50-70
As a fellow Asian...**GRAB A COAT, PATRIOT!**
They are the most corruptible?  Have you not seen the obscene amounts of money that the private prison execs make, and the horrid conditions their prisoners live under?  This is why private prisons are no longer supported by the federal government.  The very people you say are corrupt actually are shutting down the true corruption.
Not posted on the Star Citizen subreddit, not linked in the SC general on /vg/ and not being talked about by any other sites.  Sorry Nick!  Doesn't look like anyone is giving much of a shit about your opinion.  Maybe dial down the personal bias a little bit and stop pandering to Derek so hard, this article was a waste of everyones time.
Need to pad that narrative. 
Hello,  Your post has been removed because you have not [set your flair text](http://pokemonexchangebot.tumblr.com/) with a valid Friend Code. All comments and submissions in [svirtual], [bvirtual], and [hacked] require a registered Friend Code. Please set your flair text and resubmit your post.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Pokemonexchange) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Yeah, its very subtle. I could very well be wrong. I'm not gonna rack my brain on it, though. 
imo, many of those are not reasons to even stop a person.  So fucking what if he is concealing a kilo of cocaine.
Same here, I should have chosen Bulbasaur as the local park seems to be a nest 
Can't connect to anything now. Usually hitting "Go online" a bunch of times got me on and in a queue for a server, now it's just saying "Online features will be unavailable" and won't connect at all. Sigh.
If it uses the same system for hatching eggs I'm throwing my phone.
The above submission has been **temporarily removed** because:  * It does not appear to contain a tl;dr or any sort of short summary. Please edit your post to add a (preferably **bolded**) tl;dr. You must make suitable edits to ensure that the submission confirms to **all the rules** listed in the sidebar, and in [wiki](/r/relationships/wiki/index#wiki_about_.2Fr.2Frelationships) (relevant for mobile users). [Click here (once) to request re-approval](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Frelationships&amp;subject=Please+approve+my+submission&amp;message=I+would+like+to+request+the+approval+of+my+submission+at:+%0A%0A+https://www.reddit.com/r/relationships/comments/50kc9p/i_20m_am_constantly_being_shipped_by_my_best/+%0A%0A+---+%0A%0A+My+submission+was+pulled+for+*having+no+tl%3Bdr*.+%0A%0A+I've+read+the+sidebar+and+made+all+suitable+corrections+to+comply+with+the+rules.+%0A%0A+/u/Sailor1995#btn) and then click send **once** only.    The re-approval is manual, so send a **single request** only. Multiple requests do not mean faster approval, in fact they may clog the modqueue and result in re-approvals taking even more time.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/relationships) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Shit now I want to watch it
I was a member for years, and the best perk was the member prices for the D23 expos (I went to the first couple) - since you don't really get any discounts at the parks or stores, it's kind of useless for me.
I politely asked you talk to me like an adult, but it seems you can't comprehend that; so I'll try and explain it to you.   If you go to a lawyers office, or pretty much up to any professional, and ask them for counsel in their expertise, they will give what they can, and that is the end of it.   They don't go off the handle, puking up their personal opinions and or insulting people.  Nor do they go try and dive into someones personal life just to try and shame them/prove a point for the heck of it.   So hey, please leave me a lone, and go "help" someone instead of trying to judge them uh? 
thanks for the info. Sounds pretty much straight forward. i will try this tonight. thanks
I always thought that was only on phones and PDAs.
I'll always catch myself on that stuff when I just had my birthday. I'm... oh wait I'm a year older now.
Maybe just aim for the mantlet...
[Relevant WoB.](http://www.theoryland.com/intvmain.php?i=727#43)  &gt;**Kaimipono:** What was Vin supposed to do at the end of Well of Ascension? How exactly did not-using the power, end up releasing Ruin? I still don't get how that all worked. Can you explain it?  &gt;**Brandon:** What was she supposed to do? Well, this is difficult to answer, since the prophecies have been changed and shifted so much. Originally, the prophesies intended for a person to go take the power every thousand years and become a protector of mankind for a period of time. Someone to keep an eye on Ruin in Preservation's absence and watch over the world as he would have done. Imagine an avatar who arrives every thousand years and lives for their lifetime blessing the people with the power of Preservation, renewing Ruin's prison, and generally being a force for protection. (Note that Ruin wouldn't have gotten out if the prison wasn't renewed, he'd simply have been able to touch the world a little bit more.) Obviously, it changed a LOT during the years that Ruin was playing with things.  The power that gathers at the Well is definitely Preservation's. Ruin's power gathers mostly at the Pits of Hathsin--that's why the atium geodes grow there.
did you notice the detrimental effects? these are not straight upgrades like the usual equipment.
There's really no point in limiting yourself to an assassin or whatever playstyle. You change your playstyle to meet the situation and composition, depending on which is more suited and efficient.  You can very well go Tracer and deal a boat load of damage rather than only go for key targets and what not. Recognizing which method of engagement is better is important rather than saying that x way is the best way to play y.
Damn I loved this you killed it with the drums really nice vibe and made the Michelle sample your own! Love that bass that comes in as well!
Worst is when the person waving sort of looks like someone you recognize so you wave back with an excited expression instead of just a confused but polite wave. 
Dang thanks brother that should come in handy I bet
This is the correct answer. Simple and painless. Transfers take a few hours, a day at most. The exchange rate is the true current rate, and fees are small.
just luck, basically. 
hmm with this I don't fully agree but I only have experience with regeneration for hybrid and bullet booster and the differences between 0,1 or 2 for booster are notable. But for tanks like octo and spammers it probably is a useless stat (though maybe tripplets and such would benefit from having 1 regeneration). Lagmakers hybrid vid did open my eyes for this stat and I think it is an interesting and well balanced  stat. I used to put excess or life support into HP but I find regeneration clearly better. For octo maybe hp is better since they are vulnerable to one big focused attack and not so much to taking small amounts of damage slowly over time,when the later is the case (like with booster who can run or hybrid who can use his bullet to fend of a big focused attack) I clearly prefer regeneration. There is another booster strategy for bullets that would benefit more from hp,it is when you dive in and have relatively low bullet speed,you want the kill and you will take damage. Then after that you can hide and regenerate but that is bit different from how I play booster (its an interesting way though,not neccesarely bad or worse)
I think that having over 200 FPS will eliminate input lag. Having double your refresh rate + 1 will eliminate any screen tearing.
Doing hobbies for a career is no all its cracked up to bring. A hobby becomes much less fun when you have no choice but to get up in the morning and do it.
Well, it's better than getting the notifications like 10 seconds before it happens on my mlb.tv stream :'(
I suggest taking a glance at [the collection of problematic pieces STWC saw fit to publish that they've since scrubbed from their website to avoid reflecting badly on the Dear Leader](https://shirazsocialist.wordpress.com/2015/12/13/the-articles-that-stop-the-war-has-tried-to-delete/) that I edited into my post (I assume) after you read it. It's a delightful catalogue of the things you're seemingly content to gloss over in the name of a simplistic view of STWC's "anti-war" credentials.  People have been knocking them for years with good reason- and now they're knocking the man *who was in charge of them* for just the same.  &gt;consider yourself lucky!  We have to live in the country that Labour's collective suicide-by-onanism is gifting to the Tories, at a point where our ability to positively influence things at critical points has all but vanished. I wouldn't call any of us "lucky".
No, see they actually do have a monopoly on it. It's Favourite Person™ with that definition and in that context and it's a term exclusive to the BPD community. Same way you don't use cr*pple if you're not disabled. If you don't have it, don't use it. Plain and simple.  
Don't be upsetti, have some spaghetti!
Thanks for the support. It might just be slower process for me, where what beings me joy may change over time. I don't know why books are so early in her process though! Books are emotional for so many people. After paper I think might work better for some of us. 
Instead of getting rid of teachers, they should take the opportunity to reduce class sized just a wee bit. Big classes can be real chaos and no one gets as much done as they could. 
Mazda downgraded the compression ratio on North American models to 13:1 from 14:1 so it can run on 87 octane. There is no detriment to running premium, but there would be minimal performance benefits unless the engine was designed to advance the timing to increase power output.  I ran mine on premium for several tanks to test out whether premium had an effect and there was no mileage gain and no appreciable performance benefit.  The only reason why I would run premium is that Shell V Power in Canada contains no ethanol but given the price difference the slight improvement in mileage is not worth it.  Like the other posters said, Top Tier gasoline would be much more beneficial since it has more detergent content to keep the injectors and other fuel components clean.
Floors 51-55 + Mirror Stage 5
Nice! Good luck with that hour!!
My crackpot theory is that humans are originally from another continent/dimension/planet. It's really strange how they just sort of pop up all of a sudden and then boom, there's the Tevinter Imperium. But if they didn't exist before the Veil, how did they come to exist, and why isn't Solas surprised to see them/intrigued at how they came to be? 
My god I like your attitude. Usually significant others would feel bad and say it's not their fault blah blah but you're keeping him accountable . Good on you! 
Chill -.- I can't tell all my secrets.......
[Awwww yeaaaa](http://i1.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/newsfeed/000/734/417/1a9.gif)
Presumably you've checked out some gameplay vids, or are least familiar with the premise of the game.  You must acknowledge that it's not as simple as "give us teleport"?  I mean, the entire premise of the game is moving around slowly.  Not saying it cant be done, but you're carrying on like it's no big deal.
you use Fuz Ro Doh and turn on subtitles. honestly I think its a better alternative to having sub-par voice acting from a mod-maker trying to imitate the professional voice acting of Aela, Farkas, Vilkas, or Kodlak. think of it like a text adventure game lol
That's a real "smoking" gun...
I would try Graydon products. I swear they're some of the only products that don't make my skin feel oily AF during the hot California summers! Their Sun Complex, Face Glow, Green Cream and Mineral Mist are amazing and SUPER light. Once you rub them in, it's like they were never there lol hope this helps! 
*The Jetsons*
Hey, you're going to have to find the mean first. What do we need to know to to find the mean? Let's call the new mean m. We're going to need the sum of the first 9 numbers, which we'll call x and the new number 1,000,000. Recognize that we don't really need each individual number, we just need their sum, because we're only going to use them when they're all added up. But this means, using  the mean formula that, m = (x + 1,000,000)/10. We've hit a snag. It looks like there's not enough information. But remember that x didn't change, so we can use the original mean, which we express as (x + 100,000)/10 = 58,000. Solving for x, we get x = 480,000. Just plug this into the new equation, and we find the new mean, m, is equal to 148,000. Use this result and the method we applied here in a similar way with the standard deviation formula. Hope you understand why this works, not just what the answer is.
god's grove seem to be a myradir tiwm also myrador is dead
Not sure what he expected. The Mexican president was on record speaking out against Trump
Could just say them/they
middle-finger
CD Projekt Rekt
name?
[M]   &gt;The Sharkrilla  Ask yourself, is this really what Harambe would have wanted?
Ran into a Samsung hospitality TV a few weeks ago.  Wantee to connect my RetroPi for a little SNES gaming.  I unplugged the data RJ jack and then used my S5 with the app IR Remote to change the input.
even though i played the games in german back in the days for me he will also always be the voice of minsc since i played the enhanced edition :)
The contacts either assist in visualizing an optical interface for a specific procedure or simply serve as polarizing filters.
Nah. Not evil looking enough for that. 
I got excited about this yesterday when they first posted about it here.  I went to the site, and put 8 meals in my cart, ready to spend the $60 or so to test out these meals. Then when I went to check out, i noticed the shipping cost was around $45!  No fucking way am i spending 45 bucks on shipping.  They need to figure out a better way to ship for less, otherwise they wont be getting much business.  They certainly wont be getting mine until then.
How does he have money for lawyers, if he can't pay child support?  If he files for custody (is that what happened?) then your mother should file for collecting all the back child support.  Odds that the court will change your residence after this many years are pretty low.  
NEVER MIND IT JUST WORKED
Like tonight? I'd drive down to Disneyland and just sit in front of the castle. 
Welcome Centipede 
I can only speak from my own (M/38) perspective, but I feel I can empathise with your situation.  Having grown up in an ultra-religious, ultra-conservative, boys-should-be-virgins-till-marriage-too kind of family, and later having broken all ties with that family, I can see both sides of the situation. The first time I had sex (way, way before marriage), the guilt was overwhelming.  I felt like I was a disappointment to God, to my family, to myself, like I had just made the worst mistake I could make.  I'd feel a little better after awhile, rationalise things, then back to the guilt. All in all, it was pretty self-destructive, now that I look back at it.  That relationship ended up imploding, pretty badly.  The next one did too.  And the one after that.  And the one after that.  Wash, rinse and repeat. Here's the thing, though - and this is the really, really important part - each and every one of those failed relationships taught me two important things.  First, I'm deeply, amazingly grateful that, in each case, we were able to discover that we *weren't* compatible as a couple *before* we got married (sex included).  Secondly, each failed relationship taught me more about how to make a relationship successful.  So when I did end up finding the woman who I've been married to for the last ten years, I had a decent idea of what the hell I was doing, both in and out of the bedroom.  Bottom line, a successful relationship (both from a sexual and a non-sexual perspective) is not an automatic thing.  It requires work (a lot of work) and skills you can only get from experience.  So don't be afraid of sex.  Respect it, yes absolutely, but don't be afraid of it, or of being hurt, or of not being happy in the future.  Happy is something you create for yourself, not something that can be taken away from you.
Nah, on this one I just got the t-shirt from having to detangle that shit myself. I posted the Fucking Linda stories partly so that women here know that I know what the hell I'm talking about, when I try to explain why their husband is doing something shitty, that is just an old mechanism for trying to survive abuse. Trying to keep the plates spinning and keep EVERYONE happy is one I did for way, way too long.
[this is the best.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=A-LIPFgMcVA)
ebay
p0405
Full of Scouts no doubt.
They should split the cost. In situations where we used birth control pills and condoms, I paid for the pills and he paid for the condoms. 
I remember Gastelum getting asked this exact question, turns out he didn't actually get to keep the money from the Woodley fight, so he felt no obligation to give Hendricks anything.
He's now trying out for minor league baseball teams. Tim "Michael Jordan" Tebow
The wheel pants WERE on!
Brayan Pena getting the start in the nightcap in Palm Beach. I am stoked. Wish they had some draft beer besides Bud and Bud Light.  Didn't realize the Cardinals had signed Daniel Bard. It was not prerry.
First, it's Stamford not Stanford.   Second, this isn't appropriate for this sub. 
I've never thought about it, but do other nations tax religious establishments?
workin on soldier 76 at the moment
The thing is, I've been playinh for about 1.5 years. I've played all stakes from 2Nz to 400z recreationally. Dinked 4 figures a few times in tournaments etc. The software isn't a problem, and I've got enough money to spend on software.   I just feel so defeated at the moment. For the first time in my poker "career" I wanted to try and actually grind. Proper BRM, see how far I could get, bur it seems like I can't even beat NL2 or NL5 over a "big" sample size. Yeah, I realise &lt;10k hands isn't big, but just look at that graph. The swings.    How is this even possible? Am I really this bad?
Wheat's what?!?  Don't leave us hanging man!
132 393 231
call
What cute Pepe! Aw, are his eyes watering up?  Hang in there little guy.  You have a lot of work ahead of you.
That's called xenophobia (=hatred of foreigners) actually, but "racism" tends to include both meanings nowadays.  (And I'm pretty sure you can find Ukrainian nationalists who claim that kind of bullshit, like here (1st result on google...I'm sorry) http://ukrainiancrusade.blogspot.fr/2015/03/ukrainian-nationalism-and-racial-issues.html . It's funny to see all those nazi symbols used by those considered as untermensch during WW2...Some people really need to open history books.)
Floors 56-65
I have a nexus 5x and slide constantly restarts when it's in the background.  So if I'm reading a thread in a particular subreddit and I switch to another app then back to reddit I often find myself back at the top of the front page. Love the app but this is really annoying
